Authors
Vince Deehan
Number of Reviews
22

Title
Review for Marty (1955)
Directed by Delbert Mann
Written by Paddy Chayefsky (from his play)
Cast: Ernest Borgnine, Betsy Blair, Esther Minciotti, Joe Mantell.
My favourite film of all time is James Mangold's HEAVY, which I first saw 
on the day before New Year's Eve 1995.  HEAVY is about the life of man who 
is paralysed by a lack of confidence and starts to slowly awaken when he 
falls in love with a young waitress.   I can attribute my passionate 
interest in the world of cinema directly to that film.  Of course 
I had always gone to the movies before, but only a handful of times a year 
and only to see the latest blockbuster like ET and BATMAN etc..  HEAVY was 
a turning point for me because I hadn't seen many films up to then which 
moved me so profoundly and actually reflected things in my own life.  It was 
while reading through the many reviews of HEAVY on the internet, that I 
noticed one reviewer referred to the similarities between the lead character, 
Victor in HEAVY and Marty in MARTY.
I finally saw MARTY last night, having stumbled upon a copy of it in a 
London record store.   When I read the description on the back of the video 
box, I thought it probably couldn't be anywhere near as good as it sounds.  
Thankfully, I was wrong and it turned out to be  a truly wonderful  
film that  far exceeded my already high expectations.
MARTY tells the story of a butcher called Marty (Ernest Borgnine) who lives 
and works in the Bronx, New York.  He is 35 years old and is still 
living with his mother (played superbly by Esther Minciotti).  They are an 
Italian family and practising Catholics.  Marty is the oldest of all the 
children and the only one not yet married.  A fact that he is constantly 
reminded of by his friends and customers, and of course his mother who is 
desperate to see her son married.  Marty  is not a shy man, like Victor in 
HEAVY, but is very gentle in nature and in his own words is a "short, fat , 
ugly man".  He refers to himself this way throughout the film.   Marty 
tells his mother that he has given up on finding a girlfriend.  
He has tried very hard but is constantly rejected, he tells her, and he 
can't stand any more pain   His mother won't listen to any of this and 
urges Marty to go to a Ballroom in town where Marty's cousin has said there
are "a lot of tomatoes" - that's tomatoes said in a very broad New York 
accent "Ta-may-tas"!!  When Marty's mother tells Marty this, it is very 
amusing the way she says it and it makes Marty laugh, as well as us 
the audience !
Marty does go to the Ballroom  and he takes along his best friend, Angie 
(Joe Mantell).  Angie is about Marty's age and is also unattached.  The 
two of them often spend their Saturday nights together in their fruitless 
search for women, and often wind up drinking beer, watching the Hit Parade at 
Marty's house !  Angie finds a dancing partner very quickly but Marty is 
turned down and left hanging around the edge of the dancefloor alone. 
Marty is approached by a man on a blind date who has found that his partner 
is , in his words, "a dog" and asks Marty if he will take her home in return 
for 5 dollars.  Marty  finds the idea objectionable and refuses.  Quite right 
too !  However Marty watches as a man with less scruples than himself takes 
the money and wanders over to "the dog" .  This man takes one look at her and 
soon decides to walk off leaving the young lady alone and in tears.   
This has got to be one of the cruellest things I have seen in a long time.  
Unspeakably hurtful.  Marty sees this and being the good hearted man he is, 
he goes over to where she ran off to cry, to comfort her.
Marty talks to her and finds out she is called Clara, and is a 29 year old 
school teacher.  They soon find out that they have lots in common.  Both are 
unattached and living at home with their parents and they  both have given up 
hope of ever marrying.  Tragically too, they both admit to thinking of 
themselves as "dogs".  To hear them both use this term is quite shocking 
since it is a terribly cruel slur that I had thought was a British term and 
a relatively recent one at that.  To hear two Americans using this 
term in the 1950s came as a surprise.  Much more shocking is the way both 
Marty and Clara not only feel they are dogs but actually say to each other
that they are.
They hit it off pretty much instantly and a more likeable screen couple it 
would be hard to find.  They are both so genuine and decent that the minute 
they meet you know that they would be a great couple.  They spend the rest of 
the night talking to each other about themselves.  Marty and Clara both 
admit having had suicidal feelings, which Marty feels particularly guilty 
about due his Catholicism.   When Clara tells Marty that she finds
she has been crying a lot lately, Marty immediately tells her that he too is 
always crying at the smallest thing.  This is a great moment.  It's not 
often you hear men in movies admitting that they cry, but Marty is a
sensitive man and not afraid to admit it.  Not that Marty is a big girl's 
blouse ! ( Far from it, we see that Marty has a group of male friends who he
goes drinking with, and in one scene we see Marty and his mates sitting around 
his house, while his friends look at girlie mags ).
When his friends get to hear that Marty has been seeing a "dog", as 
Marty's mate Angie probably put it, they refuse to entertain the idea that 
he could possibly be serious about her.  She doesn't fit with their ideal 
image of women, which they seem to have been brainwashed with by the women in
Mickey Spillane novels !*   This bothers Marty who is very serious about 
Clara, and is obviously miffed when his friends are so dismissive.  
Marty's mother also takes a dislike to Clara, even going so far as to say 
that Clara is unattractive, but this is only due to her sudden realisation
that she is about to lose Marty . The big question is,  Will Marty ignore 
those around him and stick with Clara ?  What do you think ?!
*(As an aside, in the scene where Marty's friends are enthusing about the 
books of Mickey Spillane, the line "that Mickey Spillane is a great writer", 
is uttered three times, with the scene ending on this line.  It sounded 
awfully like the filmmakers were gently having a dig at  Mickey Spillane.  
That Marty's friends were fans is not in doubt, but it did seem to me that
the references were somewhat sarcastic in nature ! )
MARTY is one of those films that surprises you with how authentic and real 
the situations and dialogue are, especially when you realise it was made 
over 40 years ago.  Everything Marty and Clara says, you can imagine people 
saying and feeling now.  I know this shouldn't be so surprising, since  
people feel the same things now as they ever did.  The difference is that 
dialogue in films is rarely as sharp and perceptive and, more 
importantly, as natural as it is in MARTY.  The screenplay was by Paddy 
Chayefsky who I'm  delighted to say won an Oscar for his magnificent 
screenplay.  There were so many great lines of dialogue but one that really 
made me smile was Marty's mother and aunt saying that "college girls were 
one step from the street" !  Marty response to this was 
appropriately contemptful.  
I loved the scene where Marty tells Clara that they are both deluding 
themselves by saying that they live at home for the sake of their parents, 
when they both knew that in a way they felt they needed their parents.  
Clara hit the nail on the head  for me when she said she had avoided getting 
a car, because she says she had a fear of killing someone in a crash.  
I have often felt this way myself !  Another moment that stood out as being 
especially  real and authentic was during the scene at the church when 
Marty's cousin says he and his wife will sit at the back of the church with 
their baby, so as to reduce the disruption to the service.  It's not a line 
I've heard in a film  before, but it sounded so great hearing it in this film. 
In truth, to pick out individual moments is  unfair, as the whole film is a 
joy from beginning to end, with every line of dialogue sparkling !
The acting throughout is excellent, but Ernest Borgnine and Betsy 
Blair are both exceptional.   Borgnine makes Marty the most natural, kind 
hearted, genuine man you're ever likely to see in a film.  Marty is a 
difficult role as it would be easy to overdo the sentimentality and make 
Marty seem a bit pathetic and wet.  Borgnine gives Marty a strong character 
who is far from weak and is the sort of bloke who you would feel proud and 
privileged  to know.  Betsy Blair was nominated for Best Supporting Actress 
(why it wasn't Best Actress, I don't know), and is frankly astonishing in a
role that in many ways is even more demanding than that of Marty.  Clara is 
said throughout the film to be unattractive and this must be hard to keep 
hearing, for the actress.  Betsy Blair is far from ugly, but is made to 
look very plain and this must be quite a brave thing for an actress to do.  
She imbues Clara with dignity from the start and again, like Borgnine, 
underplays and gives an incredibly quiet and very subtle performance.   
They  are both are so good it's frightening.   As a tribute to their 
wonderful acting Burt Lancaster who appears in a 1955 trailer for the film 
( he co-produced MARTY ) says that they were so good that it made "him feel 
proud to be an actor".  This is high praise indeed, and so well said !
My only criticism would be that the ending is so abrupt that I was left in 
despair when the film credits suddenly started.  I couldn't bear for the 
film to end !  The end credits soon made up for my disappointment by 
featuring a great song called "Hey, Marty" which was played over the cast 
credits, complete with small clips of the cast as their names appeared. 
A great end to a great film.
I urge people to see this glorious film and I am looking forward to seeing this 
many more times during the rest of my life.
AWARDS for MARTY
Year - 1955 
OSCAR Best Picture -Winner
OSCAR Best Director- Delbert Mann- Winner
OSCAR Best Actor- Ernest Borgnine- Winner
OSCAR Best Writing, Screenplay -Paddy Chayefsky - Winner
GOLDEN GLOBE Best Actor - Ernest Borgnine - Winner
DIRECTOR GUILD AWARD for Outstanding Directorial Achievement in Motion
Pictures - Delbert Mann - Winner
Review written on Friday 20 March 1998
e-mail  vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
http://www.deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Waterland (1992)
Directed by Stephen Gyllenhaal 
Written by Peter Prince. Based on the novel by Graham Swift 
Cast: Jeremy Irons, Sinead Cusack, Ethan Hawke, Grant Warnock, Lena Headey,
David Morrissey and John Heard.
WATERLAND is an unusual and original film set in both the US and the UK 
concerning the life of Tom Crick (Jeremy Irons), an English schoolteacher of 
History now settled in Pittsburgh, telling his American pupils 
of his tragic past in England.  Irons' character has been settled in the US 
for about twenty years, although settled is perhaps not a word that could be 
used to describe his life.  His wife Mary (played by Irons' real-life wife 
Sinead Cusack) tells Tom that she anticipates the prospect of having a 
child soon.  This worries Tom, who knows that Mary is incapable of having 
children, and he immediately becomes concerned that he may be "losing" his 
wife. Losing her to the pain and trauma of her childhood.
Tom teaches at a high school in Pittsburgh and we see Tom teaching History to a 
class of teenagers in 1974.  The kids don't seem particularly interested and 
when one of the pupils, Matthew Price (Ethan Hawke), articulates this 
disinterest directly to Tom, the teacher finds himself resorting to telling 
his own personal history in a wildly misguided attempt to capture the pupils 
attention.  Tom tells the class of his teenage years in East Anglia on the 
flat east coast of England.  His story concerns his relationship with his 
sweetheart Mary (now played by Lena Headey).  The kids are partly amused and 
partly shocked when Tom describes how he and Mary had sex on trains when 
they were only sixteen.  One pupil voices her concern and tells him how she 
is now sixteen and states she is not sexually active herself and clearly shows 
her discomfort.  Although this partly puts Tom off his stride, he continues 
to regale the pupils with his stories.  
Tom tells them of how his older and slightly retarded brother Dick 
(David Morrissey) also took a shine to Mary.  When young Mary tells Tom that 
she has seen Dick following her around on his motorbike, Tom unwisely suggests 
that Mary should talk to his brother so as to teach him what girls are like 
and so that this would enable him to be able to get a girlfriend of his own. 
Tom unwittingly sows the seeds here for an imminent tragedy that will have 
a profound effect on his life forever.
WATERLAND's strength lies in the great script, excellent cinematography of the 
flat and slightly eerie flatlands of Anglia by Robert Elswit, and some 
outstanding acting.  Chief acting honours go to Jeremy Irons and Lena Headey.  
Irons plays a man who is not exactly bursting with charisma but Irons makes 
you interested in this rather tragic character.  Lena Headey who plays the 
young Mary, as a sixteen year old, is outstanding in a very demanding role 
that would be beyond the reach of many young actors.  Unfortunately Grant 
Warnock as the young Tom, while good, is no match for Headey's skills and 
rather lets their scenes down somewhat.  David Morrissey plays the retarded 
Dick to perfection and Pete Posthelwaite, although in a very small part, is 
as brilliant as ever.  Sinead Cusack as the adult Mary is badly letdown by 
the false teeth she is made to wear in the film, that frankly make her look 
preposterous and detracted my attention from her good performance.
WATERLAND is a quiet film which tells an intriguing story and tells it 
with great style.
Review written on Sun 3rd March 1996 by Vince Deehan (vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Crooked Hearts (1991)
Written and Directed by Michael Bortman.  Based on the novel by Robert Boswell.
Cast:   Peter Berg,  Vincent D'Onofrio, Noah Wyle, Peter Coyote, Cindy 
Pickett, Juliette Lewis, Jennifer Jason Leigh.
As of writing,  Sunday November 16 1997, we are currently in the midst of the 
London Film Festival.   I have been to see four festival films so far and I 
have to say that not one of them was up to my expectations.   I won't say 
what the film were, as that's not my style, but it was with great delight 
that I stumbled upon a late night TV showing of this unknown (to me) film 
that was so good that I couldn't believe that I hadn't heard of it before.   
The film was CROOKED HEARTS and it stands head and shoulders over all the 
films I have so far seen at the 1997 LFF.
CROOKED HEARTS tells the story of a comfortably-off American family, called 
the Warren family.  They live in a typical large house that so typifies 
the usual kind of house we see in US movies - most of us live in much smaller 
houses in the UK !   At the start of the film we see the middle son Tom (Peter 
Berg - COP LAND,  THE LAST SEDUCTION) coming home after dropping out of 
college.   He comes back to the family home, where we find father Edward 
(Peter Coyote), mother Jill (Cindy Pickett) , older brother Charley (Vincent
D'Onofrio - FULL METAL JACKET,  MEN IN BLACK), younger brother Ask  
(Noah Wyle- TV's  "ER",  THE MYTH OF FINGERPRINTS) and kid sister Cassie 
(Juliette Lewis - NATURAL BORN KILLERS).
Tom's older brother, the 26 year old Charley, is still living at home and 
is constantly locking horns with their father.   Charley is an intelligent 
young man but can't seem to hold down a job and is currently working in a 
warehouse.   His father is clearly exasperated by him and knows that he can 
achieve so much more with his life if he would just apply himself and mature 
a little.  Charley also knows this but seems unable to break out of a perpetual 
adolescence - his behaviour throughout much of the movie would seem more 
appropriate for a 17 year old than a man in his mid twenties.  This fact is 
mentioned in the film by his father when after witnessing Charley trying 
to leave home by driving off in the family's van , he says that his son is 
pulling off a high school stunt.   Charley is a complex character who is 
hard to empathise with but whose behaviour is nonetheless engrossing.  
He talks of the need to be thrown out of the family rather than him just 
leaving, and to this end he does some unpleasant things during the film 
which seriously hurt the whole family, in many ways...
We also see Tom's relationship with his new girlfriend, Marriet, played 
by Jennifer Jason Leigh.  This being  Jennifer Jason Leigh, she plays a 
highly kooky character who is clearly a bit unstable and quite strange !  
When we see Tom and Marriet meeting for the first time, I wanted to shout at 
the screen "No, don't go near her. She's a nutcase".  No offence meant to 
Jason Leigh, but so often she plays these odd young ladies with annoying 
behaviour and strange tics.  As the film goes on her kookiness gets toned 
down a bit, which is just as well as it makes it less hard to see what Tom 
sees in her
Part of Charley's plan in getting thrown out of the family is getting Tom's 
ex-girlfriend pregnant.   This leads to a confrontation between the two 
brothers but fails to get Charley thrown out as planned.  Charley figures 
that something more drastic is called for and something more drastic is 
exactly what he does.   
Ask Warren is Tom's younger brother, he is clearly a young man with a saintly
heart and is one of the most good natured characters I have  ever seen in a 
film.   He is played expertly by Noah Wyle, who in the years before his ER 
fame, shows what a talented actor he is.   Ask has written up a set of rules 
by which he lives his life, which he started writing when he was eight and has 
been revising ever since.   Some of the rules are funny, like "Never use 
water to put out an electrical fire" and "Always keep clean, even in places
that don't show" others are more serious like "Never make a complicated thing
simple, or make a simple thing complicated".   I am aware that as I write 
these, they may sound a bit trite, but after seeing  Noah Wyle's  performance 
as  Ask  Warren  in the film  you won't feel that way.
Juliette Lewis plays the youngest member of the family, Cassie Warren.  She 
tends to fall asleep during key moments of the film, usually when there 
is bit of tension in the air, which led to one reviewer saying that her 
character was a sufferer of narcolepsy - where people apparently become 
sleepy in times of stress.  Kurt Cobain famously fooled a journalist into 
believing he was narcoleptic - a fact which got repeated as a fact thereafter.
If Cassie really is a sufferer in the film, it never gets spelled out and 
thankfully it's use is very subtle.  It becomes a very endearing character 
trait which causes much amusement  in one key scene in the film.   
Vincent D'Onofrio gives a typically compelling performance as the troubled 
Charley.  I can't say I fully understood him, but then no one in the family 
could quite figure him out.  In the last part of the film Charley spells out 
what seems to be holding him back, when he says that he feels that no matter 
what he chose to do his father would never be pleased.   He therefore seems to
be saying that rather than try and get on with his life and fulfil his 
potential he would rather confound his father's expectations than try to meet 
them.   Charley talks of the family as being a drug that they have all become 
addicted to.   He wants to leave but knows that he can't quite make that 
decision for himself and needs to be thrown out.  It's a peculiarly infantile 
way of thinking, but one that Charley is fixed on.  All his father really 
wants, is him to do something with his life, but Charley constantly feels 
compelled to run way and abandon the family.  He can't seem to see that he 
can still be part of the family even if he does move way.  Charley probably 
thinks that the family want him to go, but the fact is they only want him to 
make a life for himself whilst still staying part of the family.   Like I say, 
Charley is a complicated character, but a fascinating one.
The score to CROOKED HEARTS is by Mark Isham and is just wonderful. It perfectly
complements and helps create the mood throughout the film.
CROOKED HEARTS is a powerful and moving film which I can't praise too highly.
I heartily recommend this film to anyone who wants to see a superbly written 
and expertly acted ensemble piece.    It's a joy to find a real gem like this 
and to be able tell other people about it.   I hope other people check out 
this wonderful film.
Review written by Vince Deehan  on Sunday 16 November 1997
E-mail  vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
Homepage  http://www.deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
Director: Tim Robbins. Screenplay: Tim Robbins based on the
book by Sister Helen Prejean
Cast: Susan Sarandon, Sean Penn, Robert Prosky, Raymond J. Barry, 
R.Lee Ermey, Celia Weston and Roberta Maxwell.
Release Date: March 29th 1996 (UK)
I have been waiting for DEAD MAN WALKING to be released here in the UK for 
many months now, and with all the high praise the film has received in the 
US I was very pleased to finally get a chance to see this fine film this 
week.  Whilst I enjoyed the film a great deal, I did feel slightly
disappointed, but this was probably inevitable considering the huge build 
up the film has received. 
The film begins with a letter sent by a Death Row inmate, Matthew Poncelet 
(Sean Penn) to Sister Helen Prejean (Susan Sarandon) asking for her help.  
Matthew is facing the death penalty for his part in a rape and double murder 
of two teenagers, Hope Percy and Walter Delacroix (played by Missy Yager 
and Peter Sarsgaard, who we see in flashbacks).  Matthew committed the 
crime with another fellow who has fortuitously been spared the death penalty. 
It is suggested in the film that at least one of them had to be seen to be 
given the death penalty and there is the suggestion that the other guy had
a better lawyer 
Matthew's family are poor and live very far away from the prison so are 
unable to visit Matthew very often, so Matthew is clearly pleased when 
Sister Helen comes to see him. Sister Helen has never counselled a death 
row inmate before and her awkwardness at their first meeting is brilliantly 
conveyed by Susan Sarandon.  Matthew comes across as a bit of a tough nut 
who although not nearly as articulate as the more than likely better educated 
Sister Helen is still more than able to get his views across to her. At times 
though Matthew appears a bit slow, especially when in the run up to his 
imminent execution he gives a series interviews to the media where he 
lets forth his racist views and desires to bomb buildings. As Sister Helen
tells him, he makes the mistake of making it very easy for people to hate him. 
Only later in the film does he finally realise the error of revealing to the 
media his leanings towards the views of Adolf Hitler. 
During the film many people question Sister Helen's motives for helping 
Matthew. A particularly poignant moment occurs when the young black children 
she works with become quietly hostile to her after Matthew's racist views 
appear in print alongside her own name.  I found myself constantly questioning 
her motives too, but quickly remembered that it was Matthew who asked her
directly for help and she saw it as her duty to do her best for him, 
regardless of how appalling his crimes were.  All along she tries to get 
Matthew to face up to his crime, which he is very reluctant to do. He 
constantly claims that whilst he was there, he never killed anyone.  Sister
Helen wants Matthew to admit his true part in the crime so that he can 
be honest with God and then face his death with dignity. 
We also meet the parents of the murdered teenagers whose pain and torment 
is a lasting reminder of the horrific killing that Matthew was involved with. 
Sister Helen meets them for the first time at a hearing for Matthew where 
he tries and fails to get a reprieve from his death penalty.  The father of 
the murdered boy, Mr Delacroix (Raymond J. Barry) confronts Sister Helen 
afterwards and tells her he is a Catholic and asks her why she is 
befriending and helping Matthew and not him and the other parents.  
Sister Helen is terribly flustered at this and admits that she hadn't 
thought they wanted her help. The anger felt by Mr Delacroix when she
gives him her number and tells him to call her (and not her call him, as he 
would have hoped and expected) is very palpable and well conveyed by 
Raymond J. Barry. 
When Sister Helen goes to visit the parents of the murdered girl, Clyde 
and Mary Beth Percy, they seem to accept her and welcome her presence. They
talk lovingly of their daughter and really open their hearts to Sister Helen. 
But in one of the most powerful moments of the film they thank Sister Helen 
for coming round to their side. This moment when Sister Helen realises that 
they have assumed that she is no longer helping Matthew and has instead
decided to help the relatives is very moving and takes Sister Helen by 
surprise and she is visibly shaken by what is happening. For me as a 
viewer I was left pretty shaken too, especially when Clyde (R. Lee Ermey) 
and Mary Beth Percy (Celia Weston) spell it out all too clearly when 
they tell her that she can't (in their opinion) be Matthew's friend and theirs
too. 
Early in the film, the lawyer that is helping Matthew, Hilton Barber 
(Robert Prosky), says that to get him off the death penalty they have 
to convince the authorities that they are dealing with a human being and 
not a monster. A monster being infinitely easier to execute than a 
three-dimensional human being. This is very true of the film as a whole, 
which through Tim Robbins' excellent script and brilliant acting by Sean 
Penn never leaves you in any doubt that whilst Matthew committed a terrible 
crime, he is still someone's brother and someone's son.  This is powerfully 
conveyed in the scene where Matthew spends some time with his mother and 
three brothers in the hours before his execution. We see Matthew 
colluding with his brothers in teasing their youngest brother into 
admitting that he broke off an all night camping expedition in their back
garden because he was scared by the sound of an animal he heard.  The love
between the whole family just shines off the screen.
The acting in this film is uniformly excellent, with Sarandon and Penn 
in particular giving the kind of exquisite performances that must make 
all other actors so proud to be in the same profession.  Whilst I thought 
Nicolas Cage was excellent in LEAVING LAS VEGAS, I feel Sean Penn gave the 
better performance and it would have been nice to see Sarandon
and Penn win both Best Actress and Best Actor at last weeks Oscars.
Special mention should also go to Roberta Maxwell who gave a fantastic 
performance as Matthew's mother and had such great dignity in the face of 
such a terrible trauma as losing your son to the death penalty.  
Raymond J. Barry was also terrific as the father of the murdered boy, 
especially in the scene where he described the sheer joy of his marriage to 
his wife who was now divorcing him due to the conflicts which arose
from the different ways they both grieved for their beloved son. 
DEAD MAN WALKING is a film which tackles the difficult topic of the death 
penalty and bravely decides to show both sides of the argument, and never 
downplays the suffering of the people left behind, both the parents of the 
murdered teenagers and the family of the executed murderer.
Review written by Vince Deehan on Sun 31 March 1996
(vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
Director: Tony Scott
Cast: Gene Hackman, Denzel Washington, George Dzundza, Viggo Mortensen, 
Matt Craven
I'd heard that CRIMSON TIDE was a classy action film, a cut above the rest, 
a tense white-knuckler. Boy, was I misled.  Whilst I appreciate that for 
alot of people CRIMSON TIDE was all of these things, I personally found 
the film very disappointing.
The plot is simple. Too simple. Gene Hackman plays Lt. Commander Hunter, 
in charge of a US nuclear submarine and Denzel Washington plays his second 
in command, Captain Ramsey.  When Hunter decides, without authorisation, 
to launch a nuclear missile at an attacking Russian submarine, it starts
a battle of wits between Hunter and Ramsey - who knows that Hunter is acting 
recklessly and is about to start a nuclear war without confirmation from his 
superiors.
Where is the tension in this film?  I certainly felt none as I watched it. 
The scene where Hunter and Ramsey come to blows has been screened too often 
in trailers for this film, for it to have any real impact on the screen. 
The characters of Ramsey and Hunter were so thinly written that it was 
frankly hard to side with either of them.  Hunter (Hackman) was basically a
hard-headed unthinking man who did what he was told and questioned nothing. 
Whilst Ramsey was a University-educated man who had learned to think things 
through and to question everything.  We knew next to nothing about these 
two men, yet we are expected to sit through two hours of them bashing 
their heads against each other. 
The beginning of the film where the conflict which led up to this point is 
explained, is frankly bewildering.  A CNN news reporter rattles through the 
history of the conflict, while a barrage of real footage from recent wars is 
flashed up on the screen.  Did anyone follow any of this ?  Am I just 
exceptionally slow, because I couldn't make any sense of it.
It would have helped if we had seen the "enemy". I realise that for those 
on the submarine, all they can see is blips on a screen, but surely we as 
a viewer could have been shown the men on the other submarine.  When all 
you can see on the screen is a few blips heading for the US submarine, 
it really is hard to feel the actual danger of the oncoming missiles.  
There are shots of the actual torpedoes heading through the water, but I 
would have preferred to have seen a glimpse of what was going on from the 
other side.
The only scene where I felt any genuine tension was when Lt. Paul Hellerman 
(Rick Schroder) was being commanded to close an airlock which would trap 
two other crew members in a flooding hull.  The theory being that two 
lives being lost would be preferable to the whole submarine being flooded 
which would kill everyone.  The panic in Hellerman's voice as he 
bravely dared to ignore his instructions, in an attempt to give his 
colleagues a chance to escape the hull, was brilliantly conveyed. 
The dialogue was interesting. "Aye, aye Captain", was heard frequently. 
I was amazed that they still say this. Very quaint, but quite encouraging 
that things like this endure amidst all the high-tech equipment of a modern 
submarine.  At least, I assume that people still say this and it isn't just
sloppiness on the part of the scriptwriters.  I gather Quentin Tarantino did 
some writing in this film.  Could it be possible that the ludicrous 
references to the Silver Surfer and Star Trek originate from Tarantino's pen. 
I really don't know.  The Silver Surfer reference occurs in a scene where a
young naval officer admits that this was the cause of a fight he has just 
had with another man. In a better film this may have been funny, but here 
it just seemed totally out of place.  It was clearly meant to be funny, 
but it wasn't.  The Star Trek reference is used by Ramsey to calm down an 
electronics man who has to quickly repair the radio receivers. The Scotty
and Kirk analogy used is desperately patronising and dumb, and would be 
better used to placate a small child and not a grown man.
Gene Hackman and Denzel Washington turn in good performances, performances 
that are far better than the script deserves. They really are wasted though, 
because they are not stretched by the one-dimensional characters and the 
dull writing.
Review written on Mon 11 March 1996 by Vince Deehan (vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Myth of Fingerprints, The (1997)
Written and Directed by Bart Freundlich
Cast: Blythe Danner,  Roy Scheider,  Julianne Moore,  Noah Wyle, James LeGros,
Brian Kerwin,  Michael Vartan,  Hope Davis, Laurel Holloman and Arija Bareikis.
When I first heard about this film I knew it was a film that I had to see.  
The combination of an excellent ensemble cast and the story of a troubled 
family coming together at Thanksgiving sounded unmissable.  I first heard 
about this film in January when it was shown at the 1997 Sundance Film 
Festival.  How I wished I could have been there to see it ! Luckily the film 
was recently released here in the UK, and I went along last Wednesday  (Dec 10) 
to the ABC cinema, next to Baker Street tube station in London, to see it.  
I often find that films for which I have very high expectations usually 
just fall short of my unrealistic hopes.  This wasn't the case with THE MYTH
OF FINGERPRINTS.  
The last film I reviewed was a little known film called CROOKED HEARTS (1991)
which told the story of another troubled family, and also happened to feature 
a young Noah Wyle playing a member of a family, called the Warren family.  
Is it coincidence that Noah Wyle's character in TMOF is called Warren.  
Probably, but I just felt like pointing this out !  
I can usually tell if I'm going to like a film by the opening sequence.  
If the film has a poor opening sequence it often bodes badly for the film.  
The opening sequence of TMOF was great - wonderful music and shots of an old 
home movie showing the main characters as children with their parents, Lena 
(Blythe Danner) and Hal (Roy Scheider).  
The first member of the family to come home for Thanksgiving is Warren 
(Noah Wyle).  Warren hasn't been home for three years and his early arrival 
causes his father some irritation.  His father Hal moans about it to his wife, 
who is delighted to see her son and having him home one day earlier is a joy 
for her - as it should be.  This is our first hint that all is not well 
between Warren and his father.  Warren  is clearly a man with a lot on his 
mind and from the first moment we see him it is obvious he is going through 
mental torment.  As the film progresses we get to see exactly what is eating 
him up inside.  Warren meets up with his ex-girlfriend Daphne ( Arija Bareikis) 
who dumped Warren three years earlier.  When Daphne explains to Warren why she
left him, it brings to the surface the inner torment that Warren has been 
living with since the breakup.
The only member of the family who is still living at home is Leigh, played by 
Laurel Holloman.  One review I've read described Leigh as a college student who 
was also returning home, but unless I missed something I got the impression she
was still living at home.  Leigh is a very peculiar character, at least to me, 
because she appears to be no younger than her brothers Jake (Michael Vartan) and
Warren, but her behaviour throughout the film is that of a 15 year old - all
naivete and childish giggles.   I would have liked to have gotten a bit more
background on this character who is quite fascinating but very hard to pin down,
because of the ambiguity concerning her actual age.  Was she  meant to be a 
teenager or a  very immature twenty-something ?  If anyone reading this knows,
please drop me a line !
The least interesting member of the family is Jake, who arrives home with his 
girlfriend Margaret (Hope Davis).   We get little depth of character from Jake 
which makes it hard to be interested in him, but at least his girlfriend 
Margaret is very watchable.  She speaks her mind throughout the film and 
manages to irritate Hal and Mia ( Julianne Moore).  When she first arrives at 
the family home with Jake, she is told by Lena that she will be in a separate 
room to Jake. She then proceeds to ask Lena , straight out, if she can 
sleep with "your son" . Her forthrightness immediately impresses Lena !
Alongside Warren, the most interesting other sibling is Mia, played with 
typical excellence by the wonderful Julianne Moore.   Our first sight of 
Mia and her partner Elliot is very amusing, but I won't spoil it for those 
who haven't seen the film !  Mia is clearly a very irritable lady and takes 
great exception to almost everything she hears from Jakes's girlfriend 
Margaret, her sister Leigh,  a hapless bookstore worker and especially her 
partner Elliot.   When Elliot innocently asks Mia what the plans for the day 
are, she snaps back that he shouldn't need to have a schedule.  It seems 
nothing said to Mia cannot be in some way offensive to her.  When Mia 
finds a book, that she has taken from the  family bookshelf, has had the 
penultimate chapters ripped out "for kindling" by her father, she is furious.  
She then storms down to the local bookstore and can barely hide her extreme 
irritation when they don't have it in stock.   When the kind and helpful 
bookstore clerk (played by Pamela Polhemus)  offers to order it for her,  Mia 
scowls at her and asks sarcastically, "Can they have it here in ten minutes?"  
Of course they can't, and she storms out.  You really feel for the bookstore 
lady who is a model of restraint and genuine helpfulness, and is faced with 
the customer who cannot be satisfied !
It is outside the bookstore that she meets Cezanne (James LeGros) who
was also in the bookshop and recognised Mia as a classmate from
kindergarten.   Cezanne is his new name, having changed it from
his original name.   Mia fails to recognise him and only when she finds out that
he has read the same book, that she so desperately wants to know the ending 
to, does she thaw out a bit and treat her old playmate with a bit of civility.  
She agrees to meet him the next day.  It later turns out that her mother has 
found an old handmade card from the infant Cezanne to Mia , expressing his love
for her.   Cezanne is perhaps the most interesting character in the film, 
probably because we learn little about him, but his sweet and very innocent 
nature is a wonderful contrast to the spiky, vitriolic Mia and it is a very 
touching sequence when they meet again at Cezanne's house, where he tells 
her how the book ended.   James LeGros virtually steals the film with his 
wonderful performance as a kind and gentle man who melts the frosty Mia.
The acting by all the cast is magnificent, but acting honours go to Noah Wyle, 
Julianne Moore and James LeGros.   Noah Wyle gives a performance of great 
intensity and greatly impresses.  Roy Scheider as Hal, says very little, but 
creates a heavy and almost menacing presence whenever he is on screen which is
very effective.
This is not a happy family and an air of awkwardness hangs over the whole 
film which is very well demonstrated when the family and their partners, 
plus Warren's very charming "loser" friends , sit down for Thanksgiving 
dinner.   The conversation is stilted and the slightest misjudged remark 
creates a very palpable air of tension.  It's clear that as the head of the 
family, Hal is responsible for the horrible air of tension that pervades his 
family.   We see clearly how his rift with Warren began, but his general 
coldness with the rest of the family is never clearly explained.   It's 
obvious to me that Hal knows that he has  become estranged from his kids
but seems unable to bridge the chasm between them , although I'm certain he 
would if he thought it were possible.
Bart Freundlich's has created a wonderful film that I definitely want to see
again  to savour the great dialogue and powerful performances.    I am
greatly looking forward to his future projects.   
Review written by Vince Deehan on Sunday 14 December 1997
e-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
http://www.deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
Written and Directed by David Cronenberg. Based on the book by J.G.
Ballard.
Cast: James Spader, Holly Hunter, Elias Koteas, Deborah Kara Unger and
Rosanna Arquette.
CRASH finally got released in the UK today, Friday June 6th 1997. It
is still banned by the London Council of Westminster but the 
distributors have managed to get some cinemas *just* on the outside 
of this boundary (namely the ABC Shaftesbury Ave for one, where I saw it),
to screen it. So people living near the West End don't have to trek
out into the suburbs to see it !  I saw it at the first screening of the day 
a t 12:40 and upon leaving the cinema I was not one bit surprised to see a 
film crew interviewing people as they left the cinema. I managed to creep past
them ! I wouldn't have known what to say !
The plot of the film, although the word plot seems hardly appropriate
giving the distinct lack of one, was showing the exploits of a group of 
individuals who get their sexual kicks from watching and being involved in 
car crashes.  I won't bother with trotting out the names of the characters 
or even try to distinguish them from each other because I found them all
deeply uninteresting and not really worthy of much close attention.
The only reasons to see this film are if you're interested in lots of
graphic sex scenes and want to see some awesome car crashes. I can't deny 
that some of the sex scenes were highly charged and very erotic (although 
I almost feel ashamed saying it !) but this is not what I go to the cinema 
to see, as a rule.  The best films have great dialogue, a good story
and believable characters.  CRASH had none of these things.
The car crash scenes were as explicit as the sex scenes and really
quite frightening. I certainly jumped out of my seat several times !  
The sheer force of some of the jolts was very well conveyed,
not least in one scene where they re-enact Jimmy Dean's car crash.  It
was terrifyingly real.  I hate driving, in fact I have a bit of a phobia 
about driving to the extent that I haven't driven a car for over
a year (I kid you not).  This film has only confirmed my fears of driving, 
or more specifically of crashing.  I'm not sure if this is a good thing 
or a bad thing !
The cast for CRASH is led by James Spader, Deborah Kara Unger, Elias Koteas
and Holly Hunter.  That's an impressive cast, but although they did their best
I'm sure , I still found all the characters hard to care about.  There was 
so little dialogue in the film, which made the characters seem very thin 
and it was impossible to understand their motivations.  How did these 
people become so twisted that a violent car crash seemed to be an essential
part of their sex lives ? The film doesn't even attempt to offer an
explanation. We are merely presented with these strange people and are shown 
in detail what they get up to, but the film offers no opinion of its own.  
It's all up to us to come to some sort of conclusion I guess.
The music by Howard Shore is one of the best things about the film.
It's mostly led by a screechy guitar motif that crops up throughout the 
film, and gives CRASH an appropriately jarring background sound
The opening titles were also great. All the names of the cast and crew
were shown coming towards the viewer and were composed of twisted chrome 
letters. Very classy, I thought.
The thing is, good music and good titles does not in itself make a good 
film.  I am very glad to have seen CRASH but I can't say I enjoyed  
watching it.  I left the cinema feeling quite brutalized by what I had
seen and it was not a pleasant experience.  I hate to be so negative about
films that I review and I would feel very guilty if this review puts people 
off checking the film out for themselves.  So I would urge people who are 
considering going to see CRASH to go along, and see what you make of it !
Review written on Friday 6 June 1997
E-mail: vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
http:\\www.deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Trees Lounge (1996)
Written and Directed by Steve Buscemi. Cast :  Steve Buscemi, Chloe Sevigny,
Anthony LaPaglia, Elizabeth Bracco, Mark Boone Junior,  Seymour Cassel, 
Carol Kane, Bronson Dudley.
UK Release Date: Feb 14 1997.
TREES LOUNGE is the entertaining directorial debut from one of the most 
enjoyable actors around, Steve Buscemi.  Whether he is playing the bellboy 
Chet ( "Chet!") from BARTON FINK or the hitman in THINGS TO DO IN 
DENVER WHEN YOU'RE DEAD, Busecmi is always a joy to watch.
He commands attention whenever he's on the screen and  I have never 
seen him  give a bad performance yet.  He has worked with a huge array of 
talented directors including the Coen Brothers, Robert Altman, Jim Jarmusch and 
Quentin Tarantino and I am delighted to say that he has shown with this film 
that he has plenty of directorial talent himself.
In TREES LOUNGE Buscemi plays the lead role of Tommy, a 30-something car 
mechanic who has been fired  for "borrowing" (as Tommy puts it) 
money from his boss and neglecting to return it.  His boss Rob  (Anthony 
LaPaglia) is now married to Tommy's ex-girlfriend Theresa  (Elizabeth Bracco) 
who is now pregnant with a child who may or may not be Tommy's.  Tommy spends
most days standing outside his former workplace which irritates Rob greatly.  
Rob stole Theresa from Tommy which perhaps explains why Tommy is keen to 
irritate Rob !
Spending time standing outside Rob's garage is, however, merely a pleasant 
diversion for Tommy's main preoccupation which is propping up the counter in 
his favourite bar Trees Lounge, named presumably because of the 
single, sad looking tree which sits just outside.  The bar itself is not 
particularly attractive and would be unlikely to attract any passing trade. 
It would appear to be only used by a select few regulars who , like Tommy, 
spend many hours there each day drinking their lives away and generally 
feeling sorry for themselves.  
We see Tommy walking the streets in search of work as a mechanic.  He gives 
the impression that he couldn't care less whether he got work or not.  He knows 
full well that his old boss Rob would not be able to provide him with a 
glowing reference but he nonetheless  tries to get work.  When Tommy's Uncle Al 
(Seymour Cassel)  has a heart attack and dies at the wheel of his ice cream 
van, he is offered the chance to take over the job, which he does.  Tommy knows
that he is hardly suited to the job but he gives it a shot.  While on the 
round Debbie (Chloe Sevigny), the seventeen year old niece of his ex-girlfriend,
joins him one day and they strike up a friendship which soon leads to a 
romance.  Needless to say, when Debbie's father Jerry (Daniel Baldwin) finds 
out, he is none too pleased.
We also meet another regular of the bar, called Mike (Mark Boone Junior).  
Mike owns a removals firm but is having marital problems and has taken to 
spending his current vacation  sitting in the bar all day drinking, and taking 
drugs in the bathroom.
In TREES LOUNGE Steve Buscemi treats all the characters with obvious 
affection despite their shortcomings.  The character of Mike is particularly 
interesting since he obviously has a lot going for him: his own company, his 
own house and a wife and child; but despite this he prefers to retreat from 
his responsibilities and wallow in self-pity in the  bar all day.  We don't  
really get to understand Mike's actions nor any of the other characters, but 
this isn't really a fault.  I don't think Steve Buscemi set out to create a 
deep character study but rather he has created a lot of characters whose 
behaviour we have to take at face value.   Why, for instance, does the old man 
at the bar, Bill, spend his entire day  (or so it seems) drinking , before 
been carried paralytic into his small bedsit above the bar.  What has happened 
in his life that has gotten him into this state ?  We don't get to find out.  
We just have to imagine it for ourselves. 
The acting from the whole cast (including brief cameos by Samuel L. Jackson 
and Mimi Rogers) is of a high standard throughout. Buscemi 
himself is  as wonderful as ever, but special mention should go to Chloe 
Sevigny (KIDS) who handles the potentially tricky role as the teenage Debbie 
with ample style and grace.  She never comes across as precocious for one 
minute which would be the pitfall for a less talented young actress.  
TREES LOUNGE is a wonderful directorial debut from one of America's most 
likeable and interesting character actors and I hope that we will see more 
from him.

Title
Review for Safe (1995)
Written and Directed by Todd Haynes. Cast:  Julianne Moore,  Xander
Berkeley,  Steven Gilborn, Peter Dunning,  Kate McGregor Stewart 
and James LeGros.
I have heard many good things said about [SAFE], with people often 
either wildly in love with the movie or completely bored by it.  I found
this reaction quite intriguing since films which can provoke such a different
response in people  are usually  worth watching, if only to see which 
response you will give.  I had the chance to see Todd Haynes'
film POISON last year at London's National Film Theatre and I have to say
that I did not enjoy it.  In fact, I was literally desperate to get out of the 
cinema - I really couldn't wait for it to end.  This was an unusually strong 
reaction for me, normally films either interest or bore me but I can usually 
manage to wait patiently till the end before leaving the cinema.  With this in 
mind, I have avoided seeing [SAFE] until now, but I have seen so many positive 
comments about this film lately that I thought I'd give it a shot.  I am 
delighted to say that I thoroughly enjoyed it and I would recommend the 
film to others.
[SAFE] tells the story of a Texan housewife (or "home-maker" as she
prefers to call herself) Carol White , played by Julianne Moore.  She now 
lives in California with her husband Greg (Xander Berkeley) and his
son Rory.   Carol seems a bit vacant and has a baby-doll voice which
was almost grating at first, but I soon got used to it.  When we first meet
Carol she seems very fragile but is well enough, but soon she starts
to become weak and listless and is overcome by a coughing fit when
out driving one day.  She also gets a spontaneous nose-bleed at
the hairdresser and gets what seemed to me to be a panic attack (but
apparently was extreme difficulty in breathing) whilst at a friends
birthday party.  Her own doctor can find nothing wrong with her 
and sends her off to a psychiatrist, thinking that her problems
are really psychological.  The psychiatrist is terribly unhelpful  and
tries to get Carol to do all the talking with no prompting, which
the very reticent Carol finds very difficult.
Carol happens upon a flier in her local gym which talks about
the effects of fumes on people's health.  Carol writes to these people and
soon she discovers that she probably has Environmental Illness, which
is the term used to describe people who have become intolerant of some of the 
chemicals in use in everyday life.  Not long after Carol suffers what appears 
to be a total body allergic reaction , or anaphylactic shock, when she walks 
into her dry-cleaners whilst it is in the process of being fumigated.  This
serious life threatening reaction gets her taken into hospital immediately, 
where her own doctor is still unable to find anything wrong with her. He is 
aware that Carol is clearly hyper-sensitive to certain chemicals but says 
that he can find no evidence that her immune system is being attacked or 
depressed.  Not long after this Carol admits herself to a safe haven she has 
heard of in the desert, where other people with her problem can retreat to, 
for a cleaner environment. 
At the retreat, called Wrenwood, she is immediately welcomed by the staff
and she at last feels that her problem is being acknowledged.  At the 
Wrenwood she meets Peter Dunning who is described, in the film,  as being a 
chemically sensitive man with AIDS.  Peter acts as leader for the group and 
gives talks on how best to approach their healing.  His belief is that as 
the outside world is cold, cynical and hateful it is therefore best to 
look within ourselves to heal ourselves.  He teaches them that in some 
way we are the cause of our own illnesses and that if we are full of 
anger and hate that this may trigger off illness and will certainly be a 
hindrance to any possible healing. The director of the haven, Claire, is 
also environmentally sensitive and tells Carol soon after she arrives , 
that her own healing was greatly helped by nurturing her ability to love 
herself.
I am fully aware, as I write, that much of the last few sentences sound 
terribly corny, but the beauty of this film is that it doesn't treat these 
notions of self-help as anything but a completely viable and sensible form of 
treatment and, given that there is no conventional treatment for their illness, 
it seems totally plausible that these ideas may have much merit.
The illness itself, Environmental Illness, is very real although it may well 
have a different medical term. I know of one case in this country (the UK) 
where one lady was no longer able to live in her own home because of her 
intolerance to certain chemicals and now has to live in a specially designed 
safe tent where she can live much more safely.  The disease is very tragic 
because it is basically an allergy to everyday life and therefore has 
devastating effects on its sufferers who may be unable to live with their 
families in case they bring them into contact with some chemical which may 
trigger a dangerous allergic reaction.  Indeed, in the film we see that Carol 
is barely able to hug her husband because of a chemical which she thought may 
have been in his cologne. 
I can't help but feel that I am perhaps taking this film to literally and that 
there is an underlying meaning that I am missing, but I don't know what it is.  
This bothers me since I feel certain that I am missing something, perhaps
something profound .  Other reviews have , I think, spoken of the illness 
as a possible metaphor for AIDS. I guess the fact that the immune system 
seems to be affected in both diseases and that both illnesses can cause 
people to be excluded from society (although excluded for different 
reasons : the environmentally ill because of the pollutants in society and 
AIDS sufferers because of some people's prejudiced views) would lead 
people to think this.  I feel that this was probably not Todd Haynes' 
intention , not least because one of the sufferers in the film is said to 
have AIDS.  I'll have to check out other people's reviews to see what other 
people think about this.
The soundtrack to the film is wonderful and was written and performed by Ed 
Tomney. It's mostly synthesisers and just sounds so right for the movie.   The 
cinematography by Alex Nepomniaschy is very crisp and clear with some 
wonderful images of the desert landscape around the retreat. I particularly 
liked the quick shots of the passing towns and countryside as Carol
travelled to the retreat.  One odd thing about the movie was that there were 
virtually no close-ups of the actors faces.  This is unusual and is something 
I haven't noticed before.  The strange thing about it is that for much 
of the movie  I had a hard time recognising Carol's husband from scene to 
scene because we never get to see his face close enough to really register 
his features.  Over the course of the movie I began to register his face more 
through repeated exposure, but I found this strange and I am  not entirely 
sure what the point of this was. This applied to all the actors, who we 
never get that close too in the frame.  In particular, I didn't recognise
the actor James LeGros until after 10 minutes into his appearance 
simply because we never really got a good close look at his face.  I think 
I liked this effect but I am at a loss as to  explain why the director 
chose this style and to what significance we are meant to attach to it.
Julianne Moore gives a great performance as Carol and is, I think, in every
single scene of the film.  It says a lot for her immense talents as an actress 
that she can create an interesting character who says not very much and is 
fairly inarticulate and yet she holds our attention throughout the film.  Kate 
McGregor Stewart was great as the retreat director and was particularly
touching when she gave Carol some advice on how best to approach her 
healing.  James LeGros is a very versatile actor who seems to change his 
appearance a lot , you'd hardly recognise him from his roles as the 
flashy actor in LIVING IN OBLIVION and as  Kyra Sedgwick's college friend 
in SINGLES.  LeGros was very good in a small role as a fellow sufferer who 
cooked up a pasta supper with Carol for the whole retreat one night.  
He also gives a surprise birthday cake to Carol which leads to Carol 
giving a just about coherent thank you speech.  Julianne Moore's acting 
here was terrific as she falteringly spoke in disjointed sentences that 
seemed utterly natural.  
Todd Haynes' script was very sharp , every word was vital to the story and
there was no pointless chatter put in for the sake of it. His writing of 
Carol's birthday speech was particularly brilliant.  I would imagine that 
this film will not be to all tastes because not a great deal happens and the 
whole film unfolds quite slowly but I found the whole film engrossing. The 
central ideas that we can assist in our own healing is certainly not a new 
idea in medicine but it is one that doesn't get talked about much, and I 
was glad that this film chose to do so.
Review written by Vince Deehan on Wed 12 March 1997.
e-mail: vince@deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Things to Do in Denver When You're Dead (1995)
Directed by Gary Fleder
Screenplay by Scott Rosenberg
Cast:  Andy Garcia, Christopher Walken, William Forsythe, Treat Williams, 
Christopher Lloyd, Bill Nunn, Jack Warden, Steve Buscemi, Gabrielle Anwar, 
Fairuza Balk, Michael Nicolosi and Josh Charles.
Just take a look at the amazing cast list for this film- pretty impressive 
isn't it?  This is almost a dream time of actors and it says so much for 
this film's calibre that such a heavyweight team of actors was drawn to this 
project.  So it is very sad to note that this film didn't do at all well in 
the US, and it really is a crying shame since this film has everything going 
for it : a great script with cracking dialogue, great characters, excellent 
performances and a good story. So why did this film fail ?  I think I may know 
why, and I will come back to this later.
When we first meet Jimmy "The Saint" Tosnia (Andy Garcia) he is seen trying to 
drum up some business for his video service.  He runs a company which films 
dying people giving advice to their relatives in their absence.  His business 
isn't doing well and this is noted by Jimmy's former boss, The Man With The 
Plan (Christopher Walken).  Jimmy used to lead a life of crime but has long 
since gone straight, although his former boss still feels that Jimmy will be 
just the right man to do a "piece of work" for him.  The Man With The Plan is 
a quadriplegic and lives in a huge mansion with his nurse, his two brutish 
bodyguards and his slow-minded son Bernard. 
We learn that Bernard has been having a very hard time getting over a 
long-term relationship with his childhood sweetheart who is now about to get 
married.  It turns out that her husband-to-be is about to arrive in Denver in 
a few days time and The Man With The Plan wants him to receive a bit of a 
scare from Jimmy and his old associates.  Jimmy is not at all keen at first, 
but The Man With The Plan doesn't seem the sort of guy you say "No" to, so
Jimmy accepts.  Jimmy gathers up all his old mates from his former days of 
crime: Franchise (William Forsythe), Critical Bill Dooley (Treat Williams), 
Pieces (Christopher Lloyd), and Easy Wind (Bill Nunn).  Jimmy plans the whole
procedure and allows Critical Bill to be one of the two men who stop the 
groom Bruce (Josh Charles) on the road into Denver.  Jimmy isn't keen to let 
Critical Bill take such an important role, since he has a bad reputation
for being a bit explosive and prone to unnecessary acts of violence.  Against 
his better judgement Jimmy is swayed when Critical Bill assures him that
those days are behind him.  When the night arrives to scare Bruce, things do 
not go to plan and Bruce ends up dead.  The Man With The Plan never intended 
this to happen and is not pleased. He orders that Jimmy's associates be killed 
and warns Jimmy to get out of Denver or face the same fate.
The rest of the film shows how Jimmy tries hard to save his friends' lives as 
well as that of his young girlfriend, Dagney (Gabrielle Anwar) who is now in 
danger too.  We also meet a young prostitute, Lucinda (Fairuza Balk) who 
clearly dotes on Jimmy and talks of how she wishes she could have a love-child
with Jimmy.  Jimmy is shown, throughout the film, looking out for Lucinda's 
interests and this is vividly shown when he barges into an office and punishes 
a businessman who has assaulted Lucinda.
I can't speak highly enough of this film, it is simply wonderful.  I have seen 
it twice now and I am looking forward to seeing it again later this week (it 
is still showing in London).  It has everything that I like to find in films : 
a great story that keeps you interested, great characters who you come to 
care about, excellent dialogue that sticks in the mind, marvellous acting from
the entire cast and it looks good too ! I have no criticisms to make.  I 
think that the reason this film was so unsuccessful in the US is due to the 
misapprehension that this is somehow a Tarantino rip-off or a self-consciously 
hip movie.  Both these assumptions are not true and I feel that people who 
may have heard these comments are really missing out on a great film.  I 
believe the film was written before RESERVOIR DOGS came out so the Tarantino 
jibes are unfounded.  The idea that it is a trendy "hip" movie is perhaps due 
to the title of the movie, which unfortunately does give this impression. I 
think that when I heard this title for the first time I got the feeling that 
perhaps this movie was wanting to sound cool and trendy, which is not a good 
impression to get.  So perhaps the title is unwise.  
I have also seen people write about some of the stylised dialogue in the 
film . There are a lot of words and phrases used in the movie that are 
clearly made up and unique to the film and its characters.  Some of these,
including : "Give it a name", "Boatdrinks" and "Buckwheats" and indeed many of 
the characters' names may seem a little forced and a tad pretentious.  Many 
of the phrases are, at first, hard to translate but they get used so often 
that their meaning is very quickly picked up.  The meaning of "Boatdrinks" is 
explained early in the film and vividly and, frankly, beautifully demonstrated
later in the film ( I want to expand on this further but I wouldn't want to 
spoil it for anyone).  My personal feeling is that the creative use of new 
phrases throughout the film lends the film a lot of charm and gives the film 
a very unique feel.  The phrases are never used to distance the viewer, far 
from it.  I felt that it made me like the characters even more, because they 
had such a wonderful way of expressing themselves.
The acting from the entire cast is impeccable.  It's the kind of film that If 
I were an actor I would be so proud to have been a part of it. Indeed, in a 
TV interview I saw with the writer and director they said that once the script 
started doing the rounds in Hollywood, actors all over town were *very* keen 
to get involved. This is a great film for actors because the parts are all so 
well written and the dialogue really gives the actors some wonderful lines to 
play with.  To pick out actors for particular praise is hard, because everyone 
deserves praise.
Christopher Lloyd has one of the most powerful scenes in the
film, where he explain to Jimmy that he knows that he has lived life to the 
full and is prepared to face his impending death with dignity.  Christopher 
Lloyd's acting here is just sublime and had me very close to tears.  Andy 
Garcia is also excellent in this scene as he struggles to come to terms with
what Christopher Lloyd's character is saying. Indeed Andy Garcia
is solid as a rock throughout and gives a hugely charismatic performance that 
just shines off the screen.  Gabrielle Anwar as the beautiful Dagney gives a 
captivating performance, especially in her first scene when she playfully 
makes fun of Jimmy when he attempts to use what she feels are practised
lines in showing how enchanted he is with her.  Her character is essentially 
similar to her part in SCENT OF A WOMAN, but she plays it well and lights up 
the screen when she appears.  Jack Warden has a small role in the film, but he 
is very memorable.  He is seen mostly in a diner, talking to anyone one who 
comes in about Jimmy and his friends.  He is such a master actor that with 
what little he had to do, he creates such a big impression.  Fairuza Balk 
gives a luminous performance as a teenage prostitute and is clearly a very 
talented actress.  She is surrounded by vastly more experienced actors yet she
still gives an excellent performance which has a lot of depth and makes you 
feel very protective for her character.  Her character is so brash on the 
outside yet Fairuza Balk shows her vulnerability very well.
I could go on forever praising all the other actors (Treat Williams and 
Steve Buscemi are superb- there, I got in two more! ), but I think you get 
the point.  Gary Fleder and Scott Rosenberg have made a fantastic film and if 
just one person checks this film out after reading my review, I will be a 
very happy man.
Review written by Vince Deehan on Monday 23 September 1996
e-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Crossing Guard, The (1995)
Written and Directed by Sean Penn
Cast: Jack Nicholson, David Morse, Robin Wright and Angelica Houston
Release Date: Friday August 16 1996 (UK)
THE CROSSING GUARD tells the story of how two men cope with the death of a 
young girl from a drink-driving accident. One man being the father of the 
young girl, Freddy Gale (Jack Nicholson) , the other being the drunk driver
himself, John Booth (David Morse).
When the film begins we see John Booth being released from the jail where 
he served a six year sentence for killing the young girl.  We see him 
welcomed back with loving arms by his parents Helen and John (played by 
Piper Laurie and Richard Bradford).  John decides to live in a trailer beside 
his parents house and no sooner has he moved in when he is visited by Freddy
Gale seeking revenge for his daughter's death.  Fortunately for John, the gun 
with which Freddy fully intends to shoot him, doesn't appear to have 
been loaded.  Freddy then decides to give John a three day reprieve before 
he returns to visit him once more.  It is this three day period which the 
rest of the film shows, leading up to their next meeting when Freddy fully 
intends to carry out his original plan of killing John.
During the course of the film we get to meet Freddy's ex-wife, Mary (Angelica 
Houston) and her new husband (played by the singer Robbie Robertson).  
Mary has two young sons from her marriage to Freddy (in addition to their 
deceased daughter), who now call Mary's new husband "Daddy" and call their 
estranged father "Freddy".  Freddy is shown to have abandoned his wife and 
sons after his daughter's death and has kept in little contact with them since. 
Whilst Mary is shown to have remained strong for the sake of their young sons,  
we see that Freddy couldn't or wouldn't face up to his responsibilities to 
his family following their tragic loss.  
Freddy runs a jeweller's shop in town and spends a lot of time in local strip 
joints and with the young girls who work there.  His daughter's loss never
seems far from his mind though, as we see him lovingly observing a young girl 
embracing her father in the street.  Freddy is convinced that taking the 
life of the man who took his daughter's life will somehow make things better.  
When he tells his ex-wife of his plans to kill John Booth, she doesn't take 
too kindly to the idea.  Freddy reckons that this means that somehow Mary 
doesn't really care for their lost daughter, so deep is his conviction
that revenge is the answer.
During the three day waiting period, John starts a new job and meets and 
starts a relationship with a woman he meets at a party, Jojo (played by 
Robin Wright).  Jojo is aware of John's past and clearly starts to develop 
strong feelings for John, as does John for her.  But it soon starts to become 
very clear to Jojo that John's guilt is so great that she feels unable to reach
him.  There is a wonderful scene in the film when John visits Jojo and seeks 
solace from the pain he is feeling. Jojo knows how mere words will not do, and
anyway she knows that she will be unable to find the right words, so she 
simply puts on a tape and urges John to dance with her.  Jojo starts to
dance but John just stands still at first, realising that
neither Jojo or anyone will be able to help him get over his pain.  The
acting by David Morse and Robin Wright in this scene is amongst the finest in 
the film.  Very few words are spoken, but you can just feel what is going 
through their minds.
The acting throughout the film is excellent. Sean Penn has drawn fine some 
performances from all the lead actors.  Jack Nicholson is on top form 
and is never anything but totally convincing. His pain and anger is palpable 
throughout the film.  David Morse is always a solid performer and he is great 
as John,  playing a man whose pain and anguish is almost deeper than that 
of Freddy's.  David Morse is a huge man but with the quietest of voices and 
superbly portrays a character who clearly has spent much of the past six years 
examining his conscience and wrestling with the pain and suffering he has 
inflicted on Freddy's family and indeed his own family.  Piper Laurie and
Richard Bradford, as John's loving parents, are excellent in the short 
amount of screen time they get. Especially, their scene in the car on the 
way home from jail when John's father is so ecstatic that he has his son back 
with him that he can't help but laugh out loud and can't keep himself from 
swearing with glee - the first time he has sworn in front of his son.  Piper 
Laurie, as John's mum,  gets in on the act too and lets out a swear word.   
This scene is wonderfully played - and I haven't really done it justice here.
Sean Penn's script is very well written and deals with very delicate 
subjects - mourning, and the feelings of revenge that can overcome 
people who have suffered such a terrible loss as Freddy.  Whilst we are never 
led to believe that Freddy's plans are right, we nevertheless can't help but 
feel for Freddy - a man who seems unable to face up to life without his
beloved daughter.  
Review Written on Sat August 17 1996 by Vince Deehan

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
Directed by Roland Emmerich
Written by Dean Devlin and Roland Emmerich
Cast:  Will Smith, Bill Pullman, Jeff Goldblum, Mary McDonnell,
Judd Hirsch, Margaret Colin, Randy Quaid and Robert Loggia.
I had been meaning to see INDEPENDENCE DAY for the past few weeks and so it
was with some degree of excitement that I went along to probably the biggest 
screen in London's West End to see it last week.  I thought it would be great 
to see it on such a large screen.  Unfortunately, the seat I had was so near 
the front that I may well have been sitting at my local small screen cinema. 
Oh well, I guess I should have got a seat a bit farther back !
In ID4 (as I will refer to the film from now on) the story is simple : aliens 
try to destroy planet Earth and the US leads the fight to save the world. 
That's about it really. I could go through the various characters and explain 
their part in the plot but this seems superfluous.  This is after all, a 
special effects movie not a character driven movie.  I have no problem with this
set up.  Although I do prefer films with solidly played and written characters,
most of us need to lighten up from time to time and watch a big, loud action
movie.  
The problem with ID4 was that I expected to be on the edge of my seat 
throughout the whole movie. I thought it would be a rollercoaster ride of a
film with lots of tension and excitement. It wasn't.  To be brutally honest, 
in the final half hour I was fighting a constant battle to stay awake. It was
a *real* struggle for me to keep my eyes open, so strong was my urge to just 
doze off.  The fact that I lost my concentration during the final reel, which 
should really have been the most exciting part of the film, says a lot to me 
about the effectiveness of this film. 
The main problem with ID4 and the main cause of my sleepiness is the simple 
fact that I couldn't get over the constant realisation that much of what I was 
seeing on the screen is all computer generated, state-of-the-art high tech 
graphics, and therefore it requires that the viewer must suspend common sense 
and be excited and in awe of the images on the screen.  I'm sorry but I 
couldn't really feel any sense of danger when Will Smith and Jeff Goldblum are 
shown flying towards the enormous mothership, when you know that the mothership
is just something that has been created on a computer (or whatever) and was 
superimposed after they had filmed their scene.  
I don't wish to imply that all special effects leave me cold, because this 
isn't true. I am saying however that the much hyped effects in ID4 did leave 
me cold and therefore made the film an interminable bore.
The one scene I enjoyed was the alien autopsy scene.  I don't mind admitting 
that I literally jumped out of my seat with fright, when they started to 
cut into the alien. Boy, was I embarrassed !  A classic horror film moment 
that really got me !
The acting in the film was generally adequate, nothing special.  The actors 
let the special effects take centre stage, which from my point of view was a 
mistake.  This was hardly the fault of the actors since they had to make
do with shallow characters and uninspiring dialogue.  Bill Pullman, who is 
one of my favourite actors, played a President who was said (at the start of 
the film) to be weak and he did what he could within the confines of the 
script.  The script called for a bland President and this is what Pullman 
provided.  Such a waste of his talents.  Will Smith gave a workmanlike 
performance and showed not a glimmer of his genuine acting ability which was 
shown in his excellent performance in SIX DEGREES OF SEPARATION (anyone who 
hasn't seen this film should check it out).  The sooner Will Smith gets 
another proper serious acting role, the better.  Judd Hirsch was the best 
thing in the movie.  His funny and touching performance as Jeff Goldblum's 
father was very entertaining.  The other really good performance was from 
Brent Spiner who was a joy as the mad Scientist looking after the Roswell UFO. 
His very appearance was funny, and he had great presence in the few scenes he 
appeared in.  I am barely familiar with his work in STAR TREK:TNG, but I was 
very impressed with his entertaining performance in ID4.
Although I didn't enjoy ID4 I can appreciate the amount of work that went 
into it and I know that many people will enjoy it.
Review written on Sunday 22 September 1996 by Vince Deehan 
e-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Nobody's Fool (1994)
Directed by Robert Renton. 
Written by Robert Renton. Based on the novel by Richard Russo.
Cast : Paul Newman, Jessica Tandy, Bruce Willis, Melanie Griffith, 
Dylan Walsh, Pruitt Taylor Vince, Gene Saks. 
NOBODY'S FOOL is set in the small town of North Bath, in upstate New York, 
and tells the story of Sully (Paul Newman) a man who has been living life 
by his own rules and has long since abandoned his wife and son.  Sully is in 
his sixties and does odd-jobs around town with his slow-minded friend 
Rub (Pruitt Taylor Vince) and is trying in vain to get some financial 
compensation from the Tip Top Construction company boss Carl (Bruce Willis), 
for whom he did a job during which he suffered an accident, damaging his knee. 
Sully hasn't got alot of money so he hires the services of a local one-legged 
lawyer (Gene Saks) who tells Sully that although they haven't won compensation 
yet, his constant attempts will eventually lead to success. 
Sully shares a house in town with his elderly landlady, Miss Beryl (Jessica 
Tandy), who clearly values Sully more than he does himself.  When Miss Beryl 
suffers a mild stroke and is released from hospital she hopes that Sully will 
look after her, a suggestion that he doesn't take too enthusiastically, 
although she is sure he is up to the job.  
Sully's ex-wife still lives in the same town, though she is now remarried, and 
she is visited for Thanksgiving by her and Sully's son and grandchildren.  
Sully meets up with his son and becomes quite close to his newly met 
grandchildren and gradually starts to bond with his son Peter (Dylan Walsh) 
who he abandoned as a child.  Sully is a very unconventional guy and sees no
wrong in the petty theft of his old boss Carl's snowblower. When Carl finds 
out who took it from him he steals it back from Sully and then Sully gets 
Peter to help him steal it again. From this point on Sully and his son begin 
to get closer and Peter comes to know his father for the first time. 
Paul Newman gives a fantastic performance as Sully, but is never flashy and 
showy.  It is a subtle performance that slowly builds up to give the picture 
of man who has a good heart but has made some mistakes in his life that he is 
now trying to amend for. There is no clear reason given for Sully's 
abandonment of his wife and son (other than admitting that he didn't get 
along with his wife), and somehow this doesn't really matter. We don't need
to know exactly what went wrong, we can see clearly enough that Sully was 
probably unable to cope with the responsibility and simply fled.  In the 
scenes with his son Peter, there are no exaggerated scenes where Sully begs 
forgiveness from his son. Sully knows he has done wrong and simply lets Peter 
into his life and lets him decide for himself if he can learn to respect
his father.  
The supporting performances are also very strong, with Jessica Tandy and Pruitt 
Taylor Vince deserving the most praise.  NOBODY'S FOOL is dedicated to Jessica 
Tandy, who died before the film was released.  She gives a fine performance 
as an old lady who knows that she has found a soulmate in Sully, although she 
knows better than to expect him to acknowledge it.  Every scene she is in 
radiates with the warmth of her character.  It's a joy to watch her scenes 
with Paul Newman, particularly the scene at the hospital where she breezily 
mentions that she had suffered a small stroke.
As Sully's friend Rub Squeers, Pruitt Taylor Vince delivers a finely judged 
performance as an innocent, childlike man who is very close to Sully, and 
feels very upset and left out when Sully's son Peter comes along and seemingly 
takes Sully away from him.  The scene where Sully reassures Rub that they are
still best friends leaves Rub close to tears . This is a scene where the 
sheer skill of Newman and Vince veers the scene away from mawkish 
sentimentality and makes it feel natural and real.
NOBODY'S FOOL is a wonderfully engrossing study of small town life where 
excellent writing and acting combine to show characters you slowly come 
to know and care about.
Review written on Sat 2nd March 1996 by Vince Deehan
(vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Heavy (1995)
Written and Directed by James Mangold.
Cast: Pruitt Taylor Vince, Shelley Winters, Liv Tyler, Deborah Harry, 
Joe Grifasi and Evan Dando.
Release Date: December 29th 1995 (UK)
HEAVY is the story of Victor ( Pruitt Taylor Vince ), a painfully shy and
overweight chef and how his obsession with a beautiful young waitress,
Callie ( Liv Tyler ), invades his life and ultimately changes it forever.
The film is set in a quiet town in upstate New York, where Victor works 
at his mother's restaurant.  Victor's mother, Dolly ( Shelley Winters ), hires 
Callie ostensibly to help out her other waitress Delores ( Deborah Harry ) 
but with the hidden intention of matchmaking her with her retiring son. 
In the early hours of the morning, as Victor sits alone in a corner of
the then deserted restaurant playing cards, Callie sidles up to him and starts
to casually chat.  Victor is clearly stuck for words yet he manages to 
communicate with her and they proceed to play a card game together. 
This is the start of Victor and Callie's touching friendship.  Victor is 
clearly enamoured by Callie, but just as soon as such ideas start in his head,
he is immediately disappointed when their card game is interrupted by the 
arrival of Callie's guitar-playing mechanic boyfriend ( Evan Dando ), who 
turns up to take her home.  This will not be the last disappointment for Victor 
during the course of the film, and a far more tragic one is in store. 
James Mangold's film shows the frustrations of people who, for various reasons,
wish their lives were less routine and more exciting.  Delores, the older
waitress, clearly stuck in a rut ( as are virtually all the characters ),
is in a dead-end job and unmarried in her forties.  She has no shortage of men
she can "take home", but no one special to stay with her and share her life.
She resents Callie from the word go, and it's not hard to see why.  Callie is
young and beautiful and has her whole life in front of her, while Delores'
own future is anything but rosy.  Leo ( Joe Grifasi ) the resident barfly, 
spends every evening propping up the counter in the restaurant, drinking 
himself into a stupor, and clearly sees no future for himself either.  He gets 
so drunk one night that Victor and Dolly take him home, where he sleeps the 
drink off on a camp-bed in Victor's room. 
The whole film revolves around Victor and shows in great detail the life of a
man who, crippled by a lack of self-confidence, is trapped in a monotonous 
life and cut off from the world around him.  It is only the arrival of Callie 
and the genuine affection and warmth she shows to Victor that finally makes 
him realise that there is a world outside that he can be part of. 
If this all sounds terribly depressing and dull, then you'd be surprised at how
entertaining the film actually is. The main character Victor is not the sort
of character you normally see leading a movie.  Victor is a silent, giant of a 
man and not prone to snappy conversation. In fact, Victor speaks hardly at all
in the film, and rarely more than half sentences at any one time.  Yet Pruitt 
Taylor Vince's performance as Victor is so mesmerising that to take your eyes 
off him for one second would be to miss a subtle facial expression that 
illuminates Victor's soul and lets you see exactly what Victor is thinking 
and feeling.
Pruitt Taylor Vince gives a performance that would surely merit an
Oscar nomination were the film to be released in the US,  and I sincerely
hope that this will happen.  Liv Tyler also gives a very impressive performance
as the young Callie, a difficult role which shows that she has alot of talent 
and Shelley Winters is a delight as Victor's mother.
The writer and director James Mangold has created a wonderful film which 
distinguishes him as a great, and promising talent .  As a mark of his 
achievement, HEAVY was awarded the Special Jury Prize for Direction at 
the 1995 Sundance Film Festival.
Review written on Feb 17 1996 by Vince Deehan ( vince@deehan.demon.co.uk )

Title
Review for Trainspotting (1996)
Directed by Danny Boyle.  
Written by John Hodge 
Produced by Andrew Macdonald 
Cast: Ewan McGregor,  Ewen Bremner, Jonny Lee Miller,  Kevin McKidd,  
Robert Carlyle and Kelly Macdonald.
Release Date:  23 February 1996 (UK)
TRAINSPOTTING is the new film from the same team (Boyle, Hodge and Macdonald) 
who made the 1995 film SHALLOW GRAVE.  This film is based on the Irvine Welsh 
novel of the same name, which has become a big cult favourite in the last
couple of years here in the UK.  This film has become the focus of a mammoth 
promotional campaign here, which has reached media saturation and then some. 
Such has been the intensity of the adverts, billboards and widespread magazine 
articles that I was seriously considering avoiding this over-hyped film.  Out of
sheer curiosity I succumbed and I went along to see if it could live up to the 
hype, which last year's similarly hyped SHALLOW GRAVE failed to do, in my 
opinion.
The film concerns the lives of a bunch of heroin addicts living in a grotty 
flat, more than likely an illegal squat, in Edinburgh.  The main character 
in this loose bunch is Renton, an emaciated young man played by Ewan McGregor 
(totally unrecognisable from his part in SHALLOW GRAVE). The film focuses on 
his life and how he tries to kick his habit.  His "so-called friends", as he 
terms them, include the suave Sick Boy (Jonny Lee Miller- HACKERS) who is 
very popular with the girls and a goldmine of opinions and facts on the career 
of Sean Connery, and Spud a bewildered and slightly dotty bloke
(Ewen Bremner -NAKED) who memorably attends a job interview while high on 
speed.  Robert Carlyle (PRIEST) plays their psychotic, though admittedly 
drug-free, friend Begbie who never misses a chance to inflict brutal violence 
on anyone who irritates him, and even those who just happen to be around him 
at the time.
We see how Renton tries to get off his heroin addiction, which proves an 
ordeal for him although he appears to be successful, because suddenly the 
film cuts to London and shows Renton seemingly enjoying himself in the 
wheeling and dealing of his new found status as an estate agent.  His obvious 
enjoyment with the job is a bit hard to fathom and hard to relate to the 
Renton we have seen earlier in the film, but it isn't long before his
old friends encourage him to take part in a risky drug deal. 
The controversy over this films revolves around the notion that the film 
glamorises drugs.  IT DOES NOT.  The film makers have bravely decided to show 
that some people get great pleasure from drugs, and to this end the film shows 
and describes the blissfulness experienced by Renton after he has just injected
himself with heroin.  But, whilst the filmmakers recognise the highs it also 
shows the desperate lows when Renton is trying to get off the drugs and starts 
suffering the hellish horrors of withdrawl.  The film, in my opinion, shows 
the lows far more vividly than the highs and this leaves the viewer in no doubt
that the downside of heroin is an experience which would nullify any potential 
pleasure.  This film is not explicitly anti-drugs, but it leaves it up to the 
intelligence of the viewer to make the decision for themselves.  
There is much humour in the film and it is all not doom and gloom.  The scenes 
involving Sick Boy where he ruminates on the careers of Lou Reed and Sean 
Connery are especially funny.  The thumping dance and rock soundtrack, while 
very prominent, is never obtrusive and perfectly creates and compliments the 
mood of the film.  The acting throughout is great, though it is hard to like
many of the characters who all seem hell bent on oblivion for much of the film.
I was pleasantly surprised by TRAINSPOTTING, in that it is worthy of much 
of the praise that is being showered on it.  It's a brave film that dares to 
show the realities of heroin addiction and lets the viewer decide for 
themselves.
Review written on February 27 1996 by Vince Deehan
(vince@deehan.demon.co.uk) 

Title
Review for Grace of My Heart (1996)
Written and Directed by Allison Anders.  Cast : Illeana Douglas,  John
Turturro, Matt Dillon, Eric Stoltz, Bruce Davison, Patsy Kensit and
Jennifer Leigh Warren.
I had never seen an Allison Anders film before seeing GRACE OF MY
HEART.  I was aware that she had an acclaimed film called GAS, FOOD,
LODGING which I am now eager to see but my only exposure to her work was
her contribution to FOUR ROOMS. Anders herself has said that she is
not pleased with her segment of that film and all I'll say is I'm glad that
with GRACE OF MY HEART she has laid that travesty to rest and produced a 
wonderful film.  Although it has not been commercially successful in the US, 
I hope it will find its audience as people spread the word about it.
The film tells the story of Edna Buxton who is an heiress to the Buxton Steel
family in Philadelphia.  Edna wins a local talent contest which gives her a 
recording contract which unfortunately fails to come to any fruition.  She 
writes her own songs and intends to record them herself.  She is told early 
in the film that you can be either a singer or a writer , but not both.  The 
age of the singer-songwriter is yet to come.  She eventually manages to get 
her songs recorded, but by other artists, when she hooks up with Joel Millner 
(John Turturro) who works in a building called the Brill Building in New York. 
The Brill Building was full of songwriters who turned out many hits during 
the 60's.  Initially Edna is told that her songs will be recorded by male 
vocal groups but eventually she manages to convince Joel to let a girl group 
she knows, record one of her songs.  
Joel manages to get Edna to agree to change her professional name to Denise 
Waverley and creates a new , more audience-friendly, working class background
for her.  Denise's songs become hits and she hooks up with another writer who
seems to want to write similar songs to her - romantic songs that use realism
and gritty social issues.  One of the songs they write is about a 12 year 
old girl who gets pregnant by her 14 year old boyfriend. Needless to say some
of these songs get banned. The rest of the film shows how Denise tries to 
launch her own solo career and marries a Brian Wilson-type figure, the tortured 
musical genius Jay Phillips (Matt Dillon) .
We hear many of Denise's songs throughout the film and all of them are
wonderful.  Illeanna Douglas mimes to the songs but she does it very well
and almost acts out the songs as she mouths the words.  The best song in the 
film is "God Give Me Strength" which is the song that Denise tries to 
launch her solo career with   At this point in the film she has joined up with 
Jay Phillips who gives her great song a wonderfully lush orchestration.  In 
the film, the song fails to become a hit and financially cripples Denise's 
publisher/manager Joel Millner.  To my ears this song is just terrific. It 
came as no surprise to see that it was written by the legendary Burt Bacharach 
and the brilliant Elvis Costello.  Elvis Costello sings his own version of this
song over the end credits and it is just as beautiful as when Illeanna
Douglas' character is singing it. At this point it is important to point out
that the person responsible for Denise's great singing voice is Kristen 
Vigard. She has a fantastic voice. 
The other song which really stood out was the song which Denise records for
her first album. This song is called "A Boat On The Sea" and was written by
Larry Klein (who was responsible for the soundtrack) and the great David
Baerwald (formerly of David and David. Remember them ?). The singer-songwriter
Shawn Colvin also appears very briefly singing a great song called 
"Between Two Worlds", written by Gerry Goffin, Louise Goffin and David 
Baerwald. Gerry Goffin was married to Carole King who Denise's character 
has been said to have been based on. 
Illeanna Douglas gives a captivating performance as Denise and carries
the audience along with her throughout the film with a warm and very
charming performance.  John Turturro is as great as ever as the wig
wearing music publisher.  Eric Stoltz is always a joy to watch on screen 
and his appearance as a socially conscious songwriter is very enjoyable.
Matt Dillon does very well with his portrayal of the paranoid and mentally
unstable musical genius , Jay Phillips; his final scenes in the film are
very powerful and moving.
The biggest star of the film though, are the terrific songs which were 
so enjoyable that I can't wait to get my hands on the soundtrack.  Allison 
Anders has created a terrific film which shows the workings of the music 
business in the 60's and is full of the joy and passions of the people 
behind the songs.
Review written by Vince Deehan on Friday March 7, 1997.
E-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk

Title
Review for Come See the Paradise (1990)
Written and Directed by Alan Parker 
Cast:  Dennis Quaid, Tamlyn Tomita, Sab Shimono, Shizuko Hoshi, Stan Egi, 
Ronald Yamamoto.
I only recently discovered the existence of this great Alan Parker film, having 
somehow missed all mention of this film when it was released six years ago in 
1990. I can't think how I haven't heard about this film before, and I can only  
guess that it must have met with little commercial and, possibly, little 
critical success.
COME SEE THE PARADISE begins with a young woman, Lily Kawamura (Tamlyn Tomita),
walking with her daughter to an imminent reunion with her newly demobbed 
husband, Jack McGurn (Dennis Quaid).  It is just after the end of World War II,
and as they walk Lily tells her daughter how she met her husband and how they 
became separated by circumstances beyond their control.
We see Jack in New York in 1936, where he is working as a sweat shop lawyer,  
an unqualified one as he explains, for a film projectionist union.  Our first 
sight of Jack is in a cinema where he and his friend Augie Farrell (Pruitt 
Taylor Vince) set light to a smoke bomb as part of a tactic to get some 
attention for their union grievances, but another pair of union men set light 
to a fire bomb which Jack wasn't warned about.  Jack expresses his anger to 
his union bosses who hadn't told him that fire bombs were going to be used.  
In the end his boss pays him off and tells him to leave as he has become too 
much of a liability to the union who have become concerned with Jack's 
superior knowledge of the law and his hot-headedness.
Jack moves out to Los Angeles and gets a job as a projectionist at a Japanese 
cinema in Little Tokyo.  There he meets and falls in love with the beautiful 
Lily, who happens to be the daughter of the cinema boss.  Lily's father (Sab
Shimono) strongly objects when Jack, a white Irish-American, starts seeing 
Lily, his Japanese daughter.  Lily and Jack eventually escape to Seattle where 
they get married on their own, and without Lily's parents blessing.  
As world War II begins and the Japanese bomb Pearl Harbour, a wave of 
anti-Japanese feeling sweeps America which results in the Presidential order 
for all Japanese people to be evacuated and sent out into a huge camp in the 
desert.  Thus, Jack and Lily and their daughter become separated.  Jack gets 
drafted but manages to visit Lily and her family, who are also imprisoned 
with her.
When we first meet Lily's brother Charlie (Stan Egi), he is working in the 
cinema with Jack, and is clearly thrilled to be an American. He loves baseball 
and is full of life and always smiling and joking.  Although he isn't by law 
allowed to become a US citizen, he seems to love America while obviously 
having great affection and pride in his Japanese roots.  He reacts bitterly 
to his imprisonment and becomes very cynical and tough, losing his friendly 
demeanour.  Stan Egi gives an outstanding performance as Charlie, who changes 
so much under the duress of his situation that he becomes almost unrecognisable
from the light-hearted man we see earlier in the film.  
In the part of Lily's husband Jack, Dennis Quaid shines in a hugely charismatic
performance. The only slight misgiving I have about the film, is the frequent 
references to Jack being Irish.  When Jack meets his brother, played by Colm 
Meaney, a reference is made to the fact that both brothers hail from Donegal, 
Ireland.  So why do neither actors play their parts with Irish accents ?  
Strange.  But this hardly detracts from the magnificence of the film.
The film is as much a love story as it is a vivid historical account of the 
appalling treatment of many innocent people, whose only crime was being 
Japanese, during World War II.  This was a part of American history that I 
knew nothing about, and the film certainly proved very educational from that 
point, as well as being a great piece of cinema. 
Review written on Mon 4 March 1996 by Vince Deehan  (vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Jacknife (1989)
Director: David Jones
Screenplay: Stephen Metcalfe, based on his play "Strange Snow".
Cast: Robert De Niro, Ed Harris, Kathy Baker.
I first saw this film about six years ago and it left such a deep impression 
on me that I was pleased to be able to see it again recently.  JACKNIFE tells 
the story of two Vietnam veterans, David (Ed Harris) and Megs/Jacknife 
(Robert De Niro).  David is living with his high school-teacher sister,
Martha (Kathy Baker), and is drinking heavily, trying to blot out the pain 
of his traumatic war experiences.  He works as a truck driver but has no life 
outside his job, other than his daily ritual of drinking himself into a 
drunken stupor each night in the local bar.
The film begins with the arrival of Megs, an old buddy who Dave served 
alongside in Vietnam, in the early hours of the morning at Martha and 
Dave's house to take Dave fishing on the first day of the season.  Martha
has never met Megs before, and although her first impressions of him are not 
favourable, she quickly gets caught up in his enthusiasm and decides to join 
the boys on their fishing trip.
It turns out that Megs is involved with a veterans support group and is 
trying to reach out to his old friend to help him get through his pain and 
torment. Whilst in Vietnam, Megs and David were close friends with another 
soldier called Bobby (Tom Isbell, who we see in flashbacks).  They were a 
tightly knit trio of pals, but Bobby was killed trying to save Megs and 
this loss of his friend has caused David incredible guilt and pain ever 
since. 
Alongside the story of Megs and David is the touching romance that blossoms 
between Megs and the shy Martha.  This cause alot of problems for David who 
knows how violent and crazy Megs has been in the past, and fears still is.  
When David warns Martha away from Megs, David also admits that he is scared
of losing his sister who has, effectively, looked after him and kept him 
company all these years.  
The romance between Megs and Martha is very well written and played by 
De Niro and Baker.  Megs is clearly a bit of a wild, untamed sort of bloke 
who appears to have as little experience of women, as Martha has of men.  
The scene where they go out for a meal together early in the film is a gem.  
Megs clumsily tries to compliment Martha but says it in a ham-fisted and 
foul-mouthed way and is genuinely shocked when Martha doesn't take it too 
kindly.  Only when they both admit to being very nervous do they manage to 
clearly communicate with each other.
Stephen Metcalfe's wonderful script is brilliantly brought to life by the 
first-class acting of De Niro, Baker and Harris.  Ed Harris as the 
traumatised David is simply perfect, and it is his deeply haunting 
performance that has been burned in my memory since I first saw the film 
six years ago.  The pain is clear in his eyes throughout the film.  The 
most powerful scene occurs when David goes to visit Bobby's 
parents and asks them to let him look after their lawn.  From the minute 
he walks in their door, it is as if part of their own son Bobby has 
returned and although their son is not mentioned in the scene his presence 
in the room is powerfully felt.  The acting here by Harris, and Walter 
Massey and Elizabeth Franz as Bobby's parents, is incredible.  The power 
lies in what they don't say, and in the expressions on all of their faces.
The only disappointments in the film lie in the Vietnam flashbacks.  They 
really are nowhere near as powerful and as effective as they should be. 
Since the whole film pivots around the death of their friend Bobby, it was 
a shame that I was left unmoved by these scenes.  
As a film showing the way past traumas can affect peoples lives, the film 
is very successful.  The suffering of war veterans should never be 
underestimated or forgotten and any film that brings this to our attention 
is to be commended.
Review written on Sat 9 March 1996 by Vince Deehan
(vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Phenomenon (1996)
Directed by John Turteltaub
Written by Gerald DiPego
Cast: John Travolta, Kyra Sedgwick, Forest Whitaker and Robert Duvall
PHENOMENON tells the story of a regular guy, George Malley (John Travolta)
who sees a blinding light on the night of his 37th birthday and becomes a
changed man. Previously George has been not especially intelligent, but 
after seeing the light he finds that he has an unquenchable thirst for 
knowledge and finds that concepts and ideas that would have been far beyond his
understanding are now very simple to comprehend.  He starts to learn about
science, begins elaborate experiments with solar energy, discovers new fuels,
learns Portuguese and still his brain craves more knowledge !
George's best friend, the lonely Nate (Forest Whitaker) is overwhelmed at the
changes he sees in his friend.  Indeed, the whole town soon starts to become
very wary of George when he almost miraculously finds a missing child, predicts
an earthquake and alarmingly breaks a mirror without touching it.  When George
breaks a secret code that the military have been using, he invokes the might
of the authorities who arrest him and treat him with great suspicion.
Eventually the true reason for George's incredible new-found intelligence is
revealed, and it turns out to be quite unexpected.  Throughout all of this,
George tries to gain the affections of Lace (played by Kyra Sedgwick), who
lives alone with her two young children. Lace eventually gives in to George's
advances, not least when she sees how much her kids take to him.
Many the reviews I've read for this film say that the film suddenly takes a
turn for the worst in the final half hour.  Whilst watching the
film I was constantly anticipating this moment (a pitfall of reading too many
reviews beforehand !). When this moment never seemed to come, for me at least,
I was greatly relieved. I would guess that the explanation for George's new
genius would be where some people started to feel cheated.  There did seem
to be a perceptible change of mood in the cinema when this moment came, but
it was only because it was so unexpected and it took a while to adjust to
what we had been watching in light of this new information.  I had feared a
much worse scenario, and I was quite relieved when things turned out the way
they did !
This is definitely a feel-good movie, much in the same way that John
Turteltaub's previous film, WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING was.  There are a couple
of points where the film teeters horribly close to overt sentimentality, but
in general the tone of the film is so good natured that you forgive these
lapses !  We all know when we are being manipulated by films, but a good film
makes you really feel for its characters so that you don't feel that your
being taken for a ride. You want to see where these people are headed and you
want to share their sadness and joy as their story unfolds.  The only scene
where I found myself cringing in my seat was the scene where Lace cuts
George's hair and gives him a shave while the soundtrack cranks up the volume
for a love song by Aaron Neville.  This was horribly misjudged, in my
opinion, and just plain embarrassing to watch.  It was like they had inserted a
music video into the middle of this lovely film.  You suddenly realise that
you are watching a film and all sense of reality goes up in smoke, albeit
only for the duration of the scene. Still, only a minor fault in a great film.
The impressive cast all give great performances in this film.  Nothing showy
or elaborate, but gentle, natural performances that have you believing in the
characters.  These aren't the performances Oscars are made of, but they ought
to be.  John Travolta is wonderful, and has the audience in the palm of his
hands from the first moment he appears.  He is well supported by Forest
Whitaker and Robert Duvall.  Kyra Sedgwick is excellent as Lace, and delivers
a wonderful performance as a single mum who is trying to give her kids a solid
upbringing and is clearly frightened, at first, of getting involved with
George Malley simply because she doesn't want to her kids to be hurt again if
things didn't work out.
All in all, PHENOMENON is a great film that made me feel good to be alive. 
Now that's a great compliment.
Review written on Tuesday September 10th 1996

Title
Review for Blow Out (1981)
Written and Directed by Brian De Palma
Cast:  John Travolta, Nancy Allen, John Lithgow, Dennis Franz.
(Warning- review contains a few minor spoilers).
With all the resurgent interest in John Travolta lately, post PULP FICTION, 
it was with great interest that I checked out one of his earlier films which 
has received some praise recently. Quentin Tarantino has said of BLOW OUT that 
it contains one of  Travolta's best ever performances.  
BLOW OUT is a thriller set in Philadelphia where Jack Terry (John Travolta) 
works as a sound effects man on low budget horror movies.  Whilst out one night 
recording the sound of the wind for one of his films, he is witness to a car 
crashing through a bridge and into the river below.  Jack jumps into the river 
where he saves a young lady in the car from certain drowning. He is unable to 
save the man in the car who has already died.  It turns out that the dead man 
is a governor and a presidential candidate and the young lady is a girl he has 
picked up, Sally (Nancy Allen).  The tyres of the car have been blown out and 
the whole accident is presented to the public as being an accident. Jack knows 
otherwise as he has taped the whole incident on audiotape and can distinctly 
hear two bangs, one of which he feels sure is the gunshot of an assassin and 
the other bang being the fatal tyre blowout.
The stage is set for a fight by Jack to prove that there has been a cover up, 
where the authorities are covering up an assassination.  A photographer , 
Manny (Dennis Franz), who just happened to be at the scene of the time,  has 
also taken a roll of pictures of the accident.  When Manny sells his pictures 
to a magazine, Jack uses his film skills to link his sound to Manny's still 
photos.  When the two are put together Jack has both visual and audio evidence 
of the gunshot.  Armed with this evidence he goes to the police who at first 
seem uninterested but eventually agree to see what Jack has got. Unfortunately, 
the assassin Burke (John Lithgow) wipes the tapes clean before the police can 
see and hear Jack's evidence.  As the film progresses we discover the real 
reason why Manny was so fortuitously present at the accident and the real 
reason why Sally was in the governor's car.  
BLOW OUT is a taut thriller with some great moments of humour.  A running gag 
throughout the film shows the trouble that Jack's boss has in trying to find 
a good screamer to use in dubbing one of his horror flicks.  The film has dated 
quite badly though, with some rather dodgy and jarring music which gives the 
film a rather hammy feel in places that I feel sure was not intentional.  The 
dialogue is not too great either but is adequate enough. I guess I am so used 
to hearing John Travolta spouting Tarantino's snappy dialogue in PULP FICTION 
that anything else pales in comparison. 
John Lithgow turns in a gripping performance as the assassin ,which is very 
effective and chilling.  Dennis Franz, currently in NYPD Blue, is great as the 
slimy photographer Manny. Although it has to be said that Franz really hasn't 
changed very much in the proceeding 15 years, except he had more hair then !  
Nancy Allen's performance improves as the film  goes on, but is pretty woeful 
at the start where she fails to match Travolta's convincing acting.  
John Travolta turns in a great performance, his charisma carries the whole 
film - so what else is new ?  His early scenes where we see him working as a 
sound effects man are terrific. Mainly because there is so much humour when we 
see him and his boss having trouble with the scream track on their horror 
film.  As the film goes on and the pressure on Jack  intensifies, Travolta 
effectively conveys the tension and stress he is under.  The best scene though 
in the film is the scene near the beginning where we see Jack on a bridge in 
the late evening recording the sounds around him.  There is hardly any dialogue 
at all in this scene, but the way John Travolta moves around with the 
microphone you never doubt his believability as a sound recordist. 
All in all, BLOW OUT is an effective thriller which, although not essential 
viewing, is well worth a look if you get the chance. 
Review Written on Thur 7th March 1996 by Vince Deehan (vince@deehan.demon.co.uk)

Title
Review for Heaven's Gate (1980)
Written and Directed by Michael Cimino.  Cast : Kris Kristofferson, Christopher 
Walken,  Isabelle Huppert,  John Hurt,  Sam Waterson,  Brad  Dourif and Jeff 
Bridges.
HEAVEN'S GATE.  What does this make you think of ?  For me, whenever I hear 
mention of this film I immediately think of the following:  massive flop,  
financial disaster, huge budget, Michael Cimino, a ruined career. This film has 
become synonymous with the idea of an overblown disaster.  So powerful is this
association that I never knew, until last week, just what exactly the film was
about. I literally hadn't a clue what the plot was until I read about the
current screening of the full 220 minute version at London's National
Film Theatre.  This is a crying shame because having seen the film in its
full 70 mm glory I can honestly say that it is a great film and one I would
urge anyone to see it if they get the chance.
The story concerns the evil antics of the rich landowners of the 
Wyoming Stock Growers Association (which gets abbreviated to just 
"The Association" throughout the film ) who, tiring of the impotency
of the law in punishing the immigrants who are stealing their
livestock, decide to take out some rough justice.  To this end they
write up a "death list" of 125 men who they deem to be thieves and
"anarchists" who they wish to be killed.  They hire local men to carry
out this task, paying them five dollars a day and 50 dollars for every
person they kill.   They also give these hired men an allowance for 
clothes and boots. This leads to a very humorous scene early
in the film when Kris Kristofferson's character, James Averill, returns
to Wyoming and enters  the local men's clothes shop to find 
hoards of men trying on suits and boots, all at the expense
of the  "association". 
James Averill is the main character in the film and is clearly 
from the upper class, but he has been excluded from the Stock Growers 
Association. This is because he won't play by their rules and disagrees
with some of their principles.  Needless to say he is opposed to their
plan to kill some of the immigrants, not least when he hears
they have 125 on their list he declares that this is virtually all of them.
(This latter statement was mentioned at least twice throughout the movie,
both times seemingly an absurd exaggeration. In fact it probably was correct, 
when you realise that virtually all of the families were set to lose at least 
one male family member).
Alongside this story of class conflict, is the romance between James Averill
and a prostitute, Ella Watson (Isabelle Huppert).  This romance is complicated
by the involvement of Nathan D Champion (Christopher Walken) ,one
of the association's hired men, who also is in love with Ella.  The difference
being that Ella charges Nathan, but doesn't charge James ! The interesting
thing about this entanglement is that both men soon become aware of the
situation but neither act as you would expect.  There are no overblown
histrionics between the two.  In fact, both men ,as well as being on opposite 
sides of the conflict,  seem to have a quiet respect for each other.  Although 
I think it's fair to say that James has less respect for Nathan, than Nathan 
does for him.
Although the general tone of the film is quite sombre, there are some 
wonderfully light hearted scenes which bring a smile to the face. The 
opening scene sees a very youthful Kristofferson running through 
gentrified streets in an attempt to catch up with  a procession which is 
headed for his University graduation ceremony.  He is running so fast 
that it gives the film an exhilarating start which is just what you need 
at the start of a 220-minute film ! (As an aside, it is quite startling how 
young Kris Kristofferson looks without his beard in the early scenes 
of him as a student.  He really looks about 20 and I half suspected 
that these scenes *must* have been filmed years before the rest of 
the film where he looks considerably older. In reality, I'm sure they  
probably weren't. Respect due to the make-up team !) . In another early 
scene we see Kristofferson and John Hurt, as his rather foppish friend 
William,  dancing around a huge green with a few hundred other dancers.  
They are moving so fast and fluently, with the camera following, that I 
was amazed that the actors weren't falling over from being so dizzy ! 
A later scene in Wyoming sees  a crazy kind of barn dance, attended
by all of the immigrants and James and Ella, where everyone is whirling 
around the dance floor on..... roller-skates !!  Was this normal practice ?!  
It sure makes for a hugely enjoyable scene.
There are many scenes in the film where there are  hundreds of 
people on screen which are well handled by Cimino.  For instance, an early
scene shows John Hurt and Kris Kristofferson walking in as a part of a 
procession into a college auditorium where there are hundreds of people
standing on all tiers shouting and cheering . This is an impressive feat of 
crowd control !  In another scene where Kristofferson is arriving back in 
Wyoming, we see hundreds of people rushing about with loads of horses
and carts thundering through the streets at very high speeds.  It is both 
exhilarating and terrifying to watch.  It looks mighty dangerous on those 
streets, a man could easily be trampled underfoot.  I hope it wasn't as
dangerous as it looks for the actors ! The sheer hustle and bustle is so 
loud and powerful, and much more intense than similar set-ups  in other films.  
Indeed the noise from the horse and carts is so loud that it drowns out 
some of the dialogue in these early scenes.  This may or may 
not be intentional, but I found it quite a nice touch.
My favourite character in the film is the Irish railway station man, Cully,
played wonderfully by Richard Masur.  His is one of the best performances in 
the film, no mean feat since we see very little of him.  His first scene when 
he talks to James Averill, an old friend, as he arrives off the train in 
Wyoming, is very impressive.  As he walks alongside the track with James, he 
talks away to his old friend in a calm and friendly manner, despite the 
barely organised chaos around him which he is doing his best to keep under 
control.  As far as I know Richard Masur is not Irish, but his mastery of the 
Irish accent is magnificent.  The dialogue he is given by Michael Cimino is 
extremely well written with some wonderful Irish phrases that I hear frequently 
amongst my own family.  Richard Masur imbues Cully with a deep humanity
and this is strongly felt in his final scene later in the film where he is 
killed by the Association (presumably because he is kind to the immigrants).  
I felt truly sad when he was killed, and this scene deftly showed the depths
to which the men of the association had sunk to. 
Kris Kristofferson is good as the man of conscience, James Averill. James 
is a man of few words  and he ably conveys this on screen.   Isabelle Huppert 
is very charismatic as Ella and gives a very charming performance.  John Hurt 
suffers from a having to deliver  a weak character who despite delivering a 
strong speech in the opening of the film and openly opposing the death list
proposed from his fellow Stock Growers , turns into a slightly 
preposterous figure at the end when , during the furious battle between 
the immigrants and the Association, he merely stands around sardonically 
saying how he wishes he were in Paris.  This is not John Hurt's fault, far 
from it.  I feel that his character was poorly developed  by Michael Cimino. 
Given his strong feelings against the death list it would seem strange that
he still turned out for the battle at the end. Surely, he would have withdrawn
long before this point. Then again, maybe it just shows how truly weak this 
man is and therefore my criticism is unfounded. 
Geoffrey Lewis gives a wonderfully comic performance as Trapper, who 
looked almost like a parody of the type of grizzled men you often see in 
Westerns (which I suppose is a  genre that  HEAVEN'S GATE could be 
said to fall into, with the immigrants taking  the part of the American 
Indians). Trapper is a man whose face is quite literally caked in mud.  
His appearance is truly hilarious.  Geoffrey Lewis has a wonderful scene 
where he tells a story about fighting a wild fox , to a dumbfounded and 
naive young man, played by a young (but instantly recognisable) Mickey Rourke. 
Christopher Walken is also in this scene and his face is a picture, as he 
can barely control his mirth as Trapper spins his tall tale. Trapper also 
raises a laugh, at least I laughed, when he is collared by the Association 
as he approaches a river.  The Association men ask him what he is up to.  He 
innocently replies he is about to take a bath. This is likely true, but his 
appearance would suggest his face has not seen running water for some years !
I saw this film in a packed cinema at London's National Film Theatre 
where this rarely seen full length version is being shown . It was great to 
see so many people turning out to see this wonderful film. I gather it has 
been doing strong business in this limited run which is lasting about a week.
I only hope that Michael Cimino gets to hear about this  wonderful show 
of interest his film is getting.  I personally thought long and hard about 
whether I would go along to see such a long film that had been so poorly 
received upon release.  I wondered whether I'd get bored early on
and wish I'd never gone and end up feeling trapped in my seat out of respect 
to Michael Cimino.  The film ran approx. 3 hours and 40 minutes with a 
20 minute interval at the 2 hour mark. I can honestly say that I am pleased 
that I went along because I thoroughly enjoyed the film and never once got 
bored. This is some achievement, since many films which run for a fraction 
of this time have me stifling yawns within half an hour ! After the interval, 
there was approximately 2 minutes of soundtrack played  without  pictures 
which ran into the second part of the film.. This was  a great idea and gently 
lulled you back in to the mood of the film. I assume this was what Michael
Cimino planned himself, either way it worked wonderfully.  I can't help 
but feel that the story could have been told in far less time, but the slow and 
stately pace was effective and lent greater weight to the film as a whole.
As befits an epic of a film this has been a bit of an epic of a review 
(at least in terms of length). I hope that other people will take any 
opportunity they get to see the full length version of this much maligned 
film which is no way deserving of its initial poor response.  It is a great 
film and I thoroughly recommend that people check it out for themselves.
Review written by Vince Deehan on Wed, 19 Feb 1997. 
E-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk.

Title
Review for Nil by Mouth (1997)
Written and Directed by Gary Oldman.  
Cast:   Ray Winstone,  Kathy Burke,  Charlie Creed-Miles,  Laila Morse,
Edna Dore.
I went along to see Gary Oldman's highly praised directorial debut 
with great anticipation, last night (Oct 13).  I had been looking forward to 
seeing this film since I first heard about it.  I am delighted to say that I
was not disappointed with what I saw.  
The film shows the lives of an extended family in South London.  The family
is dominated by Ray, played superbly by Ray Winstone  (SCUM,  QUADROPHENIA,
and the recent UK release FACE) who is married to Valerie, played by Kathy
Burke ( anyone who saw Danny Boyle's acclaimed TV drama MR WROE'S
VIRGINS will not have easily forgotten Kathy's acclaimed performance as a 
a very disturbed young woman).  Valerie's younger brother  Billy ( Charlie
Creed-Miles - THE FIFTH ELEMENT,  TVs "PRESS GANG")  is a heroin addict, who
is the source of worry for all of the family, not least his mother Janet 
(Laila Morse).  To round off the family we have Ray and Valerie's daughter, 
Michele (played by the young and very talented Leah Fitzgerald) and Kath 
(Edna Dore - HIGH HOPES) who is Janet's mum and , of course, Billy and 
Valerie's grandmother.
Ray is an alcoholic and a wife beater, and seems incapable of speaking without
swearing repeatedly.   He is clearly a troubled man , is in constant need
of attention and finds himself unable to control his anger when he  feels he
is unable to exert full control of his family.  He loves his wife's kid brother
but is unable to restrain his violent nature when Billy's betrays him and takes
Ray's drugs.   He also loves his wife, but is so filled with insecurity that 
the minute he gets the slightest whiff that Valerie may be cheating on him 
( which she certainly wasn't) he lets his temper and his fists fly with 
devastating physical and psychological trauma to Valerie.  Up to this point 
in the film, we have seen that Ray is a violent man who you wouldn't want to 
upset, but this still doesn't prepare the viewer for the shock
of seeing the sickening way in which he abuses his wife.
Gary Oldman has created a powerful film, but one  that will definitely 
not appeal to everyone.  Not all cinemagoers will be able to stomach his no 
holds barred view of a working class family battling to keep together against 
the forces of drug addiction, alcoholism and domestic violence.  The swearing 
is constant throughout the film and will doubtless offend some viewers.  
I have to say that the opening scene with Ray and one of his mates telling 
boozy anecdotes in a club, was so full of expletives that I thought maybe 
this film wasn't for me.  You thought Dennis Hopper was the definitive 
swearer in BLUE VELVET ?  Just wait till you hear Ray in NIL BY MOUTH.  To be 
serious though,  there are lots of people for whom swearing is just common 
nature and a normal part of everyday conversation, and this is certainly the 
case for Ray and some members of his family.
The film is scored by Eric Clapton.  Surprised ?  I sure was, but Clapton has
done a terrific job with a subtly jazzy score that fitted the film very well.  
There are also a couple of  modern songs in the film, that although I can't 
identify who the artists were, provided some great moods in the film.
The acting from the entire cast is outstanding.   Kathy Burke's performance,
particularly in the second half of the film is superb.    She was  awarded
the Best Actress award at the 1997 Cannes Film Festival.  She imbues Valerie 
with a quiet dignity that is evident from the first time we see her.  Ray 
Winstone is magnificent as Ray.   Ray is a monster essentially but Winstone 
lets us see that Ray is deeply vulnerable and  and that in many ways Ray is 
just as much of a victim as Valerie.  This last bit may sound outrageous,  but 
I know that many people will see this film and feel sorry for Ray as well as 
Valerie.   What horrors has Ray gone through to make him behave the way he 
does ?  Ray is deeply warped and is clearly very weak when compared to the 
proud and defiant Valerie.
Chief acting honours go to Kathy Burke and Ray Winstone but special
mention must be given to Laila Morse who plays Valerie and Billy's mum.
Laila Morse is Gary Oldman's sister and has apparently never acted before.
Her part is very demanding, perhaps even more demanding than Burke's
and Winstone's.   She plays a mother who is well aware of her son's
drug addiction but in the face of feeling helpless to stop him, she takes
the hard option of supporting him, paying for his addiction and trying
to at least give him a stable base to hold on to.   One scene in particular 
comes to mind, when she sits in the driving seat of her van and glances
anxiously behind her at Billy injecting drugs in the back of the van.  Her
acting in this scene and in the scene where she discovers Valerie after
her beating, is very impressive.   
I wholeheartedly recommend NIL BY MOUTH to anyone who isn't
afraid to see the ugly side of human nature in unflinching detail.   Having
said that, one thing that does come through strongly throughout is the
strong affection and love the members of the family feel for each other,
particularly Janet for Valerie and Billy and Ray for his daughter and wife.
Nil BY MOUTH is partly based on Gary Oldman's own upbringing although
his own father was never violent.  Oldman knows these people and for all
their faults he looks on them affectionately and with compassion.
Gary Oldman has created an outstanding film, which will surprise and 
confound those who think that actors should stick to working in front of 
the camera and not behind it !
Review written on Tuesday 14 October 1997
e-mail : vince@deehan.demon.co.uk
http://www.deehan.demon.co.uk
